Authors
Justin Felix
Number of Reviews
44

Title
Review for Relative Fear (1994)
Written by Kurt Wimmer
Directed by George Mihalka
Starring Darlanne Fluegel, James Brolin, Denise Crosby, M. Emmet Walsh
Rated R (contains violence and profanity)  94 minutes
Synopsis:  The mother of an autistic boy becomes suspicious after three
people die in her home in as many days.  Also suspicious of the
"accidental" deaths, a police detective investigates by prowling around the
house uninvited and interrogating the four-year-old boy who has never
spoken a word in his entire life.
Comments:  RELATIVE FEAR is a better-than-average suspense film featuring a
very solid script.  Writer Kurt Wimmer crafts some well-developed,
believable characters, and his plot unwinds like a good Dean Koontz novel.
A piano teacher and a professor, and their autistic son, Adam, are the main
characters, and the sometimes strained relationship between the three
provide some interesting drama early in the film.  What's nice about
RELATIVE FEAR, though, is that a number of intriguing supporting characters
come in and out of the movie.  More attention is given to developing these
characters than is given to the cardboard cut-outs who typically populate
movies of this genre.  Wimmer's plot successfully manages to keep the
viewers guessing who the killer is, as Adam, the professor, and a tutor
appear to be suspects at different times in the film.  RELATIVE FEAR also
raises some questions about such social issues as home schooling and TV
violence without allowing those issues to take center stage and disrupt the
storyline.
The acting, for the most part, is pretty good.  RELATIVE FEAR sports a
strong stable of veteran actors giving fine supporting performances.  James
Brolin handles his police detective role in an authoritative manner, and M.
Emmett Walsh plays a suspicious, sickly old man convincingly.  STAR TREK:
THE NEXT GENERATION's Denise Crosby turns in a surprisingly creepy
performance as a mentally-disturbed prisoner who casts into doubt whose
child Adam really is.  Matthew Dupuis, the child playing Adam, also manages
to handle several suspenseful scenes in his near-silent performance capably.
RELATIVE FEAR is certainly not the turkey I expected it to be (which is
good), but it's not a perfect film either.  Its conclusion, when the killer
is revealed, is a little hard to believe, and it ends on a disappointingly
superficial and cliched note.  Overall, however, I would recommend this
film to someone looking for a good video rental.

Title
Review for 8MM (1999)
8 MM (1999)
A film review by Justin Felix.  
Copyright 1999 Justin Felix.  
Any comments about this review?  Contact me at justinfelix@yahoo.com  
This review also appears in The Shrubbery at
http://www.theshrubbery.prohosting.com/0499/movie1.html  
All of my film reviews are archived at
http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Justin+Felix 
Written by Andrew Kevin Walker.  
Directed by Joel Shumacher.  
Starring Nicolas Cage, Joaquin Phoenix, and Peter Stormare.  
Rated R (contains intense graphic violence, nudity, and profanity)  123 mins.  
Synopsis:  Private detective Tom Welles is hired by a wealthy widow to
uncover the origins of a snuff film owned by her late husband.  After
uncovering the authenticity of the film, Welles descends into an underground
world of perverse pornographers seeking vigilante revenge on the filmmakers.  
Comments:  8 MM is one of the more disturbing mainstream movies I have seen
in a long time.  Though it doesn't present a snuff film (a movie which
documents a person's murder for real, usually during or after some form of
sexual act) as explicitly as the cult classic MUTE WITNESS and violence as
shockingly as, say, NATURAL BORN KILLERS, 8 MM stays in your head long after
you see it.  It is not fun to watch; see something else if you get upset by
realistic, sadistic violence.  This film's violence and perverse sexuality
skirts closely into NC-17 territory.  For those with strong stomachs,
however, 8 MM is an intelligent, worthwhile thriller, especially during its
second hour.
Nicolas Cage, after a couple ho-hum movies, returns to material which allows
him to utilize his strong acting abilities.  As Tom Welles, a private
detective and caring family man to a wife and newly-born daughter, Cage
skillfully and convincingly portrays a decent man whose unwavering energy
slowly transforms into obssession and violence as he is pulled into a
nightmarish world of underground pornographers and brutal sexual deviants.
Serving as a guide to this world is Joaquin Phoenix, who plays a struggling
songwriter named Max California.  California, despite his name, is a
surprisingly intelligent and complex character, and Phoenix does a very good
job at slowly pulling the audience to sympathy for the character.  The real
star of the movie, though, must be Peter Stormare.  Stormare played the
"really, really evil guy" in FARGO, and his character, Dino Velvet, in this
movie seems about ten times more evil and unpredictable.  His performance is
very chilling.  
8 MM's success may hardly be surprising.  It was directed by Joel
Schumacher, who, hopefully, saw this film as an apology for the absolutely
dreadful BATMAN AND ROBIN.  Before directing the last two BATMAN duds,
however, Schumacher was responsible for several well-made horror flicks:
LOST BOYS, FLATLINERS, and FALLING DOWN.  8 MM certainly joins the rank of
these minor classics and is perhaps most reminiscent of FALLING DOWN in that
both films present an average man who self-destructs before the audience's
eyes.  8 MM was written by Andrew Kevin Walker, who also penned the Academy
Award-winning thriller SEVEN a few years back.  Like SEVEN, 8 MM is full of
dialogue which haunts you well after leaving the theater.  Welles is
searching for answers.  How could anyone possibly drug and then slowly,
methodically, sadistically kill a teenaged girl to make a film?  When
confronting one of the perpretrators at the end, the murderer responds that
there are no reasons.  He just enjoys it.  That, Walker seems to suggest, is
where the real terror lays: not in the crime itself but in the fact that
rational motives do not exist.  
A couple minor faults led me to my four-star rating (five stars is the
highest rating I give).  One, I found it a little difficult, early on, to
accept the fact that a hardened private detective would get physically
disgusted when first seeing a snuff film.  Yes, snuff is a horrible thing,
but a detective of Welles' caliber has probably encountered awful things
before.  Second, some of the clues Welles gathers are too convenient.  He
discovers, for example, the victim's diary in her private bathroom, despite
the fact the the police, the FBI, and her own mother have all investigated
the room before.  Finally, the closing scene seemed trite and improbable
considering the rest of the film.  
Despite the above criticisms, 8 MM is an engrossing story.  One of the best
scenes in the film occurs toward the end as a crazed Welles, who no longer
seems like a hero, brutally beats one of the pornographers responsible for
the snuff film.  He pulls a gun on the man and, for a relatively long amount
of time, struggles to decide whether or not to kill him.  He then leaves the
building and calls the victim's mother, in the middle of the night, to
basically see if she would support the action.  The entire scene is tense,
unpredictable, and emotionally charged.  Rarely, anymore, do horror films or
thrillers provoke suspense in me as 8 MM, with scenes like this, did.  
8 MM is most certainly not for the faint of heart.  This is a graphic,
oftentimes unflinching, look into the darkness which resides in both
ordinary and extraordinary people.  If you're prepared for a film of this
nature, I give it an enthusiastic recommendation.

Title
Review for Stalked (1994)
Story by Pierre David and Cyndi Pass.  
Written by Craig Hamann and Mark Evan Schwartz.  
Directed by Douglas Jackson.  
Starring Maryam D'Abo, Tod Fennell, Jay Underwood.  
Rated R (contains violence, nudity, and profanity)  95 mins.
Synopsis:  A mentally unstable man undergoing psychotherapy saves a boy
from a potentially fatal accident and then falls in love with the boy's
mother, a fledgling restauranteur.  Unsuccessfully attempting to gain the
woman's favor, he takes pictures of her and kills a number of people in his
way.  
Comments:  STALKED is yet another in a seemingly endless string of
spurned-psychos-getting-their-revenge type movies which are a stable
category in the 1990s film industry, both theatrical and direct-to-video.
Their proliferation may be due in part to the fact that they're typically
inexpensive to produce (no special effects, no big name stars) and serve as
vehicles to flash nudity (allowing them to frequent late-night cable
television).  STALKED wavers slightly from the norm in one respect: the
psycho never actually has an affair; on the contrary, he's rejected rather
quickly (the psycho typically is an ex-lover, ex-wife, or ex-husband).
Other than that, STALKED is just another redundant entry doomed to collect
dust on video shelves and viewed after midnight on cable.  
STALKED does not provide much suspense, though that is what it sets out to
do.  Interspersed throughout the opening credits, for instance, a
serious-sounding narrator spouts statistics about stalkers and ponders what
may cause a man to stalk (it's implicitly implied that all stalkers are
men) while pictures of a boy are shown on the screen.  After these credits,
a snapshot of actor Jay Underwood appears.  The narrator states that "this
is the story of Daryl Gleason" and tells the audience that he is the
stalker.  Of course, really, this is the story of restauranteur Brooke
Daniels.  If the movie was meant to be about Daryl, then it should have
been called STALKER not STALKED.  
Okay.  So we know who the stalker is even before the movie starts; no
guesswork required.  STALKED proceeds, then, as it begins: obvious,
obvious, obvious.  The opening sequence, contrived quite a bit, brings
Daryl and Brooke (the victim) together.  Daryl obsesses over Brooke,
follows her around, and tries to woo her.  Ultimately rejected by her, his
plans become more and more desperate and elaborate.  These plans include
the all-time, psycho-in-love, cliche: the murdered pet.  For some reason,
this genre's films require a dead pet to be found by the victim stalked.
STALKED is no exception (it's a cat this time -- found in the shower).
Events like these lead to the inevitable showdown between stalker and
stalked, where only one survives (guess who it invariably always is and
you'll guess the conclusion to this turkey).  
STALKED's cast is uniformly adequate: not anything to write home about but
also not all that bad either.  Jay Underwood, as the stalker, turns toward
melodrama a bit too much.  He overdoes it, in other words, but he still
manages to be creepy enough to pass as the type of stalker the story
demands.  Maryam D'Abo, about the only actor close to being a star here
(she played the Bond chick in THE LIVING DAYLIGHTS), is equally adequate as
the "stalked" of the title, even though she seems too ditzy at times to be
a strong, independent business-owner.  
Brooke (D'Abo) needs to be ditzy, however, for the plot to proceed.  Toward
the end, for example, Brooke has her suspicions about Daryl.  To ensure he
won't use it as another excuse to see her, Brooke decides to return a
toolbox he had left at her place to his house.  Does she just leave the
toolbox at the door when no one answers?  Of course not.  She tries the
door, opens it, and wanders around the house.  When Daryl returns, he
enters the house, of course, so our heroine is in danger.  Somehow, even
though her car is parked at the front of the house, right by the front
door, Daryl is oblivious to her presence inside.  The whole episode places
an incredible strain on the audience's suspension of disbelief and
questions the validity of either character's intelligence.  
STALKED receives two stars because, even though it is highly derivative and
somewhat boring, it is not so bad that it cannot be watched.  Rated R
mostly for several murder scenes and brief nudity in a strip bar, it is not
as offensive as many other thrillers in this genre are.  If you're in the
mood for a good suspense film, though, stake out something else.  

Title
Review for Fortress (1993)
Screenplay by Troy Neighbors, Steven Feinberg, David Venerable, and Tony
Curtis Fox.  
Story by Troy Neighbors and Steven Feinberg.  
Directed by Stuart Gordon.  
Starring Cristopher Lambert, Kurtwood Smith, Loryn Locklin.  
Rated R (contains violence, profanity, and nudity).  
Synopsis:  Sometime in America's future, a couple tries to have a second
child after their first dies, even though it is against the laws designed
to decrease the world population.  Caught and interred in the Fortress, a
prison run by a supercomputer named Zed, they discover a few of its
disturbing secrets before planning an escape.  
Comments:  FORTRESS offers a cliched, bleak, apocalyptic future and some
rather gory violence, but it still manages to be an entertaining sci-fi
thriller.  What probably saves this movie from being a turkey is its
storyline.  No spectacular, jawdropping special effects are required (which
is good considering some of the effects look very dated here despite the
fact that FORTRESS is only five years old).  It seems that the world is
having a population problem, and one of the measures instituted to correct
this problem is a strict law allowing couples only one child.  Violators of
this law are labeled "Breeders" and sent to prison if discovered.
Christopher Lambert and Loryn Locklin play such an unlucky couple who,
despite their best efforts, are discovered to be expecting a second child
(their first died very young) by the authorities.  Sentenced to several
decades of imprisonment, they are sent to the Fortress, an isolated prison
surrounded by desert.  It is here in the Fortress where things become
interesting.  A number of key surprises await the couple (and the viewers
of the movie, of course) regarding the nature of the prison's staff, the
creepy warden, and Zed, the computer which seems to have a mind of its own.  
Though Christopher Lambert and Loryn Locklin adequately play their roles as
the unlucky couple, the real star of this film is Kurtwood Smith, a veteran
actor who really does a good job portraying the prison warden.  His
character is the most interesting in the film and responsible for the
surprise plot twists.  
Despite its solid plot, script, and cast, FORTRESS is not without its
limitations.  As mentioned before, the special effects (and the setting
itself, for that matter) are a little on the campy side.  Also, I felt a
couple of the gory scenes, though by no means particularly excessive
compared to other films of the same genre, didn't seem justified in this
movie.  FORTRESS, I'll admit, however, has the distinct quality of being
the only film, to the best of my knowledge, where one may be
"intestinized."  Trust me, one does not want to be intestinized, as we
graphically find out in this film.  It is quite unpleasant.  For a movie of
this genre, I found FORTRESS, all in all, rather entertaining.  Science
fiction fans will definately find it worth watching.

Title
Review for Fatal Charm (1992) (TV)
Written by Nicholas Niciphor.  
Directed by Alan Smithee.  
Starring Christopher Atkins, Amanda Peterson, Mary Frann.  
Rated R (contains violence, nudity, and profanity)  90 mins.  
Synopsis:  Valerie, a high school junior who doesn't look a day under 22,
writes bad poetry, complains about how much she hates school, fantasizes
about a young guy on trial for raping and murdering six women, chooses him
as a pen pal, and plays hooky to see him in court.  After a jailbreak, the
killer puts on big sunglasses, wears a half-buttoned jacket, and uses his
fatal charm to go after Valerie.
Comments:  "Alan Smithee" directed FATAL CHARM, which should have been more
appropriately titled "Fatal Bore" or "Fatal Crap".  If you find out that a
film you're about to see is directed by "Alan Smithee," then you should
seriously, seriously, seriously consider watching something, anything,
else.  "Alan Smithee" is a pseudonym which a number of directors have used
when they produce something really bad.  Frankly, I'd be embarrassed if I
had directed this turkey, so I think I understand why the director might
have picked the "Alan Smithee" moniker for this film.
Where to begin with this painfully poor thriller?  Let's start with the
acting.  It's pretty bad.  Amanda Peterson plays Valerie and shows at least
some talent (the rest of the cast don't), even though her performance isn't
exactly stellar material.  She's also miscast; she seems way too old to
still have a year of high school to complete.  Her scenes with Valerie's
mother, played by Mary Frann, are a joke.  The two look as though they're a
couple of coworkers going out to lunch together, rather than a daughter
with her mother who just doesn't understand.  Christopher Atkins, a
handsome enough actor who plays the killer, Adam, looks like a clown in the
second half of FATAL CHARM.  Trying to appear malicious and dangerous, he
wears large sunglasses and a half-buttoned jacket.  If Disney decided to do
a zany comedy caper about the Unabomber, Atkins would probably be a perfect
candidate for the lead, but he doesn't cut it here.  Early on in the movie,
a number of scenes occurs in a courtroom.  Outside of the laughably poor
performances given by the actors portraying lawyers, the people sitting in
the benches provide the silliest effort at drama in the film.  They
constantly shift and turn and arc their heads in mock interest in what has
got to be one of the worst perfomances that a large group of people have
given at one time ever.
FATAL CHARM's storyline, such as it is, inspires more yawns than thrills.
The script belabors a red herring, early on, about a second suspect who may
have committed the murders for which Adam (Atkins) is charged with.  This
suspect, however, turns up strangled and drowned halfway through the film:
an obvious plot fault.  Even for the idiots who didn't consider the movie's
title as Valerie and a blond newsreporter commented how innocent and
charming the defendant seemed, it becomes quite obvious that Adam is
dangerous when the other suspect washes up.  So, the audience must wait (if
they haven't already stopped watching) as the necessary details fall into
place and the killer goes after the heroine in the drawn-out finale.
The video box for this dud describes FATAL CHARM as an "erotic thriller".
A thriller it isn't, and neither is it particularly erotic.  I can't
imagine, if someone were in the mood for something "erotic," that he'd be
happy after watching this fluff.  A few erotic moments occur in the film;
they take place in a van with little lighting and are filmed out of focus
(see, they're supposed to be Valerie's fantasies -- how creative).
On a personal note, I was disturbed by the ludicrous English literature
class shown in this film which Valerie had to suffer through.  It's no
wonder why she hated high school so much.  As an instructor of English
myself, I have a hard time accepting the fact that in a course emphasizing
great literature, a teacher would stoop to reading a student's bad poetry
(of course, it's Valerie's) about boyfriends out loud and then embarassing
its author in front of class with questions about the poem's inspiration.
I guess the public school system is still setting dubious standards for its
students.
FATAL CHARM won't charm anyone, unless there's someone that's charmed by
boring, lifeless, insipid, suspenseless thrillers.  If you happen upon this
turkey, just keep moving on.

Title
Review for Courtyard, The (1995) (TV)
Written by Wendy Biller and Christopher Hawthorne.  
Directed by Fred Walton.  
Starring Andrew McCarthy, Madchen Amick, Cheech Marin.  
Rated R (contains violence, nudity, and profanity)  103 mins.  
Synopsis:  A New York architect moves to L.A., rents an expensive
apartment, meets really weird people, sleeps with a mysterious woman
carrying a parasol, and plays detective rather than work on his project
when his neighbors start dying.  
Comments:  THE COURTYARD is a better-than-average cheap murder mystery.
It's a made-for-cable feature (Showtime produced it) which is enjoying a
second life in video rental outlets.  In fact, a subtle in-joke is played
toward the end of the film: flipping through a stack of bills, the main
character glances at an envelope from Showtime.  
THE COURTYARD plays out as a basic whodunnit, although the plot does become
more involved as the movie progresses than is typical of thrillers of this
kind.  A multitude of suspects are presented, and a number of successful
red herrings throw the audience off as to the killer's identity.  Many
suspense movies make the mistake of not developing their supporting
characters, but not THE COURTYARD.  The Shangri-La apartment complex, as it
has been christened, is populated by interesting, though strange, tenants,
and it's rather fun to slowly learn more about them (they all have secrets
or something to hide).  
Andrew McCarthy and Madchen Amick are adequate as the lead characters.  The
supporting cast, however, are the real stars here.  Cheech Marin (half of
the popular Cheech and Chong comedy duo) humorously plays an L.A. detective
who likes to eat while examining murder crime scenes.  Vincent Schiavelli
and David Proval, both veteran actors, appear as some of the architect's
creepy neighbors and do a good job of it.  
Wendy Biller and Christopher Hawthorne's screenplay, though it is not
perfect, does provide some nice details.  As stated before, the characters
are uniformly well-developed (no cardboard cutouts here).  Some of the
dialogue is memorable; for example, Cheech Marin's detective groans about
his caramel sundae and informs the architect about the caramel / chocolate
chip debate in L.A.  The movie obviously did not have a particularly big
budget, but that doesn't seem to hinder it much.  
THE COURTYARD ends tritely (everything is just a little *too peachy*).  The
architect unveils his design for a new mall modeled directly off of his
apartment complex.  He then claims that it's the most original thing he's
ever done.  One has to wonder about that statement.  Overall, however, THE
COURTYARD is an entertaining little thriller and makes a suitable rental
choice if you've already seen your fair share of blockbuster theatrical
releases.  

Title
Review for Soldier (1998)
SOLDIER (1998)
A film review by Justin Felix.
Copyright 1998 Justin Felix.
Other reviews by me may be found at
http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Justin+Felix
This review also appears in the Shrubbery --
http://www.theshrubbery.prohosting.com/1198/movie1.html
Screenplay by David Webb Peoples.  
Directed by Paul Anderson.  
Starring Kurt Russell, Jason Scott Lee, Gary Busey.  
Rated R (contains violence and profanity)  approx. 95 mins.
Synopsis:  In the near future, Sergeant Todd, trained from birth to be a
remorseless killing machine, and his squad of merciless soldiers are
replaced by genetically engineered warriors.  Believed dead, Todd is dumped
onto a garbage planet where a small group of colonists struggle to survive.
 Todd defends these colonists from the warriors who replaced him when their
superior officer decides the colonists would make good target practice.
Comments:  On paper, SOLDIER has the ingredients to make a superior film.
It is written by David Webb Peoples, who penned the screenplay to the
classic BLADE RUNNER and the critically-acclaimed 12 MONKEYS.  It is
directed by Paul Anderson, who was responsible for EVENT HORIZON, an
unfairly criticized cross-genre film, and MORTAL KOMBAT, a popular movie
based on the video game of the same name.  It even stars Kurt Russell, who
has acted in good science fiction films such as STARGATE and John
Carpenter's remake of THE THING.  Though SOLDIER is an entertaining and
visually interesting film, it proves to be somewhat disappointing
considering the talent involved in the film's production.  
SOLDIER begins in the year 1996, when Sergeant Todd is born.  Apparently,
on the date of his birth, Todd, along with a group of other babies, is
chosen to be involved in a government(?) program to raise and train a group
of fearless ground soldiers.  Through a series of rapid flashbacks, the
audience sees Todd grow to adulthood and some of the campaigns on other
worlds that he is involved in.  Already, the audience is keenly aware of
the major flaw in the movie: nothing is ever really explained.  SOLDIER
never details (a) who Todd fights for, (b) why a technologically savvy
society needs human ground troops when they could probably find less
expensive means of achieving military goals, or (c) how our planet becomes
an intergalactic colonizing force within the next 20 years.  Apparently,
the only things the filmmakers wish us to know is that Todd is a killing
machine and the person in charge is a really bad guy.  What follows is the
standard sci-fi cliche of the underdog against a supposedly superior
opponent; in this case, Sergeant Todd and a ragtag group of colonists try
to defend themselves from a horde of genetically-enhanced, heavily armed,
well-trained soldiers.  Guess who wins.  
Having criticized the screenplay, I can now say that I still enjoyed
SOLDIER.  This is a movie which attempts to cross genres to create
something different.  EVENT HORIZON, Paul Anderson's last film, combined
horror and science fiction, giving the audience a haunted spaceship.
Similarly, SOLDIER combines science fiction with the western and the action
movie, giving us SHANE on another planet.  The mix of genres works for the
most part.  Though the story, including the ultimate resolution, is quite
obvious, the film's landscape, an apocalyptic garbage dump of a planet
presented paradoxically beautiful in its harshness, and some brilliant
pyrotechnic fight scenes make SOLDIER a fun Saturday afternoon matinee
movie.  Like EVENT HORIZON, however, SOLDIER doesn't pull any punches [no
pun intended] when it comes to violence -- one of the reasons I suspect
EVENT HORIZON was so squarely criticized.  SOLDIER is violent; it has many
bloody scenes, a number of grisly deaths, and some rather sadistic moments
(these warriors, for instance, have no reservations shooting unarmed young
children in combat situations).
Kurt Russell plays Sergeant Todd quite effectively.  Todd does not have
much dialogue in the movie; he remains largely silent.  This silence,
however, adds to the tension of the film, as the colonists fear that his
training will make him snap at any moment.  SOLDIER, thus, like EVENT
HORIZON, is an extremely tense film.  Russell, though, exaggerates the
tough guy image a little too much at times, granting the film some much
needed melodramatic camp humor.  Gary Busey plays his signature stock
character, a slick though ultimately well-meaning individual, adequately
here.  Rising star Jason Scott Lee, like Russell, isn't given much
dialogue, but he portrays the main antagonist suitably enough.
SOLDIER strikes me as a made-for-the-SciFi-channel movie with a budget.
Despite the talent behind the film, it is not great.  SOLDIER, however,
doesn't seem to carry the pretense of greatness.  It's a little sci-fi
action film which delivers enough special effects and action sequences to
carry it through.  It's not worth six bucks, but it's certainly worth a
matinee price.  
Rated R, SOLDIER contains many graphic scenes of violence which may be
inappropriate for children.  Although, to give the movie credit, SOLDIER,
more so than other recent action films like the "video game"ish BLADE and
the humorous RUSH HOUR, shows the results of violence, both physically and
mentally, on its victims.

Title
Review for House on Haunted Hill (1999)
All of my film reviews are archived at 
http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Justin+Felix
This review has been submitted to The Shrubbery  
http://www.theshrubbery.com
Any comments about this review?  E-mail me at justinfelix@yahoo.com
Inspired by the 1958 film HOUSE ON HAUNTED HILL starring Vincent Price.  
Starring Geoffrey Rush, Famke Janssen, and Chris Kattan. 
Rated R (contains violence, profanity, and brief nudity). 
Synopsis:  Eccentric millionaire Price offers $1,000,000 to each of his 
guests who appear at a gathering at a former sanitarium.  The only catch 
is that they have to survive the night at the establishment, an 
establishment haunted by its former staff and patients.
Comments:  HOUSE ON HAUNTED HILL is based upon the original 1958 film of 
the same title directed by William Castle and starring Vincent Price.  
In an obvious homage, the millionaire's name is Price and he sports a 
thin mustache like Price used to have.  This is a pretty bad horror 
film, yet bad horror films sometimes are very entertaining, and HOUSE ON 
HAUNTED HILL is just such a film.  It is, surprisingly, better than 
another recent haunted house remake, THE HAUNTING, a film which owes its 
basis to the classic horror novel by Shirley Jackson.  THE HAUNTING had 
literary pretensions and fell flat on it face.  HOUSE ON HAUNTED HILL 
owes its lineage to a B-movie 40 years old and makes no illusion that 
it's a crappy horror movie.  Thus, somehow, it proves slightly more 
successful. 
I can't think of another recent film which has had such an eclectic 
cast.  It is this cast which lifts this ho-hum thriller into a 
borderline entertaining exercise in camp horror.  Price, the main 
character, is played by Geoffrey Rush, the Academy-Award winning actor 
of SHINE.  Rush seems to be making a downward spiral in the movie 
industry, a spiral reminiscent of Ben (GHANDI, SCHINDLER'S LIST) 
Kingsley's ridiculous appearance in the camp sci-fi classic SPECIES.  I 
don't know why, but sometimes it's entertaining to see "quality" actors 
in bad movies.  More surprises?  Rising star Taye Diggs plays a 
stereotypical African American sports figure (rather lamely too), and 
singer Lisa Loeb (!) appears as a TV news reporter.  The highlight of 
the cast, however, has to be SATURDAY NIGHT LIVE member Chris Kattan.  
Kattan's comic sense provides several good humorous moments as he plays 
the hysterical proprietor of the former sanitarium. 
While the first half of the film leaves the audience guessing as to 
what's exactly going on, the second half dissolves into standard ghost 
story stuff and loses some of its suspense.  A disappointingly cheesy 
ending really mars this movie too.  HOUSE ON HAUNTED HILL, I suspect, 
has just about left the second-run theaters.  It's worth catching on 
cable next year, if you get a chance.  If you have a choice, pick this 
movie over THE HAUNTING, it's the better of two evils, you could say.  
Though, more appropriately perhaps, it'd be better to say that it's the 
better of two turkeys. 

Title
Review for Never Talk to Strangers (1995)
NEVER TALK TO STRANGERS (1995)
A "Turkey of the Week" film review by Justin Felix.  
Copyright 1998 Justin Felix.  
Written by Lewis Green and Jordan Rush.  
Directed by Peter Hall.  
Starring Rebecca De Mornay, Antonio Banderas, Dennis Miller.  
Rated R (contains violence, nudity, and profanity)  86 mins.  
Synopsis:  Blond criminal psychologist Sarah chooses to copulate with
greasy Tony the mysterious Puerto Rican rather than bearded Cliff the
wisecracking neighbor upstairs.  In the meantime, someone sends Sarah
rotting flowers, puts her name in the newspaper's obituary column, and
kills her cat.  
Comments:  NEVER TALK TO STRANGERS, a colossal waste of time, moves slower
than molasses in winter to arrive at a conclusion which should be obvious
to the audience 20 minutes into the film.  One wouldn't think that two
genuine movie stars, Antonio Banderas (EVITA) and Rebecca De Mornay (HAND
THAT ROCKS THE CRADLE), and the acerbic comic genius Dennis Miller
("Saturday Night Live") would be involved in such a celluloid backfire as
this turkey.  Not only are they in it, however, but De Mornay executive
produced it.  What was she thinking?  
NEVER TALK TO STRANGERS centers upon Sarah, a psychologist examining the
ill-tempered Max, a murderer soon to stand trial.  She receives a sudden
visit from her father which elicits flashbacks of some tragedy in her early
childhood.  Two men woo her; Tony the "security consultant" wins her over
(so they have passionate sex replete with cheesy saxophone music).  A lot
of psychobabble is thrown around about multiple personality disorder, but
the movie asks its audience not to derive the obvious conclusion between
mpd and Sarah, and instead offers several male characters as red herrings.
86 minutes, the running time of this cinematic mess, thus, seem like 86
hours.  
A good chunk of NEVER TALK TO STRANGERS is spent upon Sarah and Tony.  Why
would the career-minded, professional Sarah feel attracted to the walking
steroid with a black hat called Tony?  That's one of the film's mysteries
which are never answered.  Regardless of motive, De Mornay and Banderas
strip down and have sex several times in what passes for eroticism.  They
also manage to go out before copulating occasionally -- in one of the
stupidest scenes of the film, Tony takes Sarah to a carnival that's *right
outside* his dingy apartment (that way, they can hurry back and have sex
quickly).  Also, apparently, the weather changes quickly in their locale:
they're at this outdoor carnival one day before having sex; the next day,
they're out playing in the snow before having sex.  
The filmmakers attempt to produce a suspenseful plot interspersed with Tony
and Sarah's "character development."  Someone is out to get poor Sarah
(though most of the audience should have figured out who before any of this
starts).  Rotting flowers, a writeup in the obituary, and a beaten neighbor
are just a few of the bad things which happen to her.  Suspense Cliche
Number One also occurs: whenever someone is stalked in thrillers, by any
means, if the stalked has a pet, that pet will die.  Oftentimes, to even
further the cliche, the murdered pet is a cat (suspense filmmakers, for
some reason, just don't like cats).  Sarah, in NEVER TALK TO STRANGERS,
receives a package and, lo and behold, discovers her mutilated cat within.
Suspense at its very derivative!  
As stated before, NEVER TALK TO STRANGERS is a poor excuse for a film whose
sole purpose seems to be exploiting Banderas and De Mornay's bodies as
often as possible.  Comedian Dennis Miller is completely wasted here (he's
not given lines that are suitable for his persona) and doesn't even appear
all that much.  Maybe, in a way, he's lucky for that.  Early on in the
movie, Sarah tells Tony, after meeting him in a supermarket, that she had
been advised to never talk to strangers.  Allow me to advise that you never
watch this stinker.  

Title
Review for Spawn (1997)
Screen Story by Alan McElroy and Mark A. Z. Dippe.  
Screenplay by Alan McElroy.  
Based on the comic book by Todd McFarlane.  
Directed by Mark A. Z. Dippe.  
Starring Michael Jai White, John Leguizamo, Martin Sheen.  
Rated PG-13 (contains violence and profanity)  93 mins.
Synopsis:  Al Simmons, top-notch assasin with a guilty conscience, dies in
a fiery explosion and goes to hell.  Making a pact with Malebolgia, a chief
demon there, Simmons returns to Earth 5 years later reborn as Spawn, a
general in Hell's army donning a necroplasmic costume replete with knives,
chains, and a morphing cape.  Sullen, wise Cogliostro and flatulating,
wisecracking Violator vy for Spawn's attention.  
Comments:  When Todd McFarlane left Marvel Comics (where he had made a name
for himself as a first-rate comic book penciller on the "Spider-Man"
titles) to join the newly-formed, creator-owned Image Comics, a new comic
book legend was born: Spawn.  McFarlane's "Spawn" immediately became a
commercial and critical success and a defining comic book series of the
1990s.  McFarlane created a hero who was not only original but visually
intricate, allowing McFarlane to utilize his knack for artistic detail to
the max.  The early "Spawn" issues brilliantly capture McFarlane's genius
at illustration and show his early attempts at writing.
With the popularity of "Spawn" and the success of the current Warner
Bros.'s BATMAN film franchise, a movie version of some sort seemed
inevitable for Spawn.  In the summer of 1997, hence, New Line Cinema
released SPAWN, a live-action film based on the groundbreaking series.
This topheavy exercise in violence and special effects unfortunately
topples quickly and leaves fans of the comic book, like me, numbed by how
much SPAWN misses the mark.
What happened?  Why is SPAWN so bad?  Todd McFarlane himself executive
produced this disappointing misfire and even appears in a cameo.  I don't
think, however, that his presence necessarily hurt (or helped) the film.  I
place the blame, in part, on the recent Hollywood trend, fueled by public
demand apparently, for special effects blow-out movies utilizing the latest
computer technology.  These films focus upon the effects at the expense of
everything else: character, plot, dialogue, etc.  SPAWN, reflecting this
trend, shows the audience one gratuitous scene after another populated with
morphing characters and filled with unnecessary pyrotechnics.  Hardly a
minute goes by in this film without fires, explosions, knives and chains
appearing out of nowhere, glowing eyes, or constantly transforming demons.
A lot of it is visually interesting and technically solid, don't get me
wrong, but, because the script and cast aren't engaging, SPAWN ultimately
comes across like overwrought wallpaper (the surface may capture the eye,
but nothing exists underneath).  
SPAWN's translation of the comic book suffers the most at the storyline
level.  McFarlane's Spawn was a tortured hero.  A mercenary by trade, Al
Simmons was nonetheless a warm man in love with the beautiful Wanda.
Having died and journeyed to Hell, he made a pact to return to Earth to be
with Wanda.  Simmons, however, discovers that his memories are fragmented,
his body a creepy mess, and his wife married.  Despite his sometimes
violent nature, readers couldn't help but feel sympathetic toward his
plight as the spawn of the underworld.  SPAWN attempts to show all of this
but does not spend nearly the time it should to do so.  When the characters
are developed, they seem absurd rather than touching.  The cartoonish
dialogue and implausible subplot (a general possesses the antidote to a
supervirus called Heat-16 which he wishes to unleash to enslave the world)
do not help matters.  
SPAWN, in an apparent attempt to duplicate the success of BATMAN, also
unwisely spends too much time on a villain, the Violator (BATMAN favored
the Joker over Batman).  John Leguizamo, like Jack Nicholson in BATMAN,
receives top billing in the cast as the Violator; Michael Jai White (Al
Simmons / Spawn) is second.  I ordinarily find Leguizamo an intensely
annoying presence in films which seems to make him a perfect candidate for
the Violator.  The film, however, spends so much time on the Violator's
offensive antics that they grate on the nerves.  Apparently meant to be the
comic relief in the film (as Nicholson was in BATMAN), especially when
contrasted with the sullen Spawn, the Violator's lines are oftentimes
grotesque and unfunny, leaving the audience wishing he would leave.
Leguizamo does a satisfactory job in the role, but he is seen far too often
in the film.  Michael Jai White, a relative newcomer to theatrical
releases, seems to be an appealing actor, and he handles his role
adequately, but we see little of him without various masks on.  More time
needed to be spent on White's character before he became Spawn for the
movie to pull at the heartstrings.
A special note should be made about Martin Sheen as the over-the-top,
obnoxious, evil General Wynn.  Easily the hammiest performance in the
movie, it's hard to imagine how Sheen mucked up his role so much; after
all, he played a Vietnam assasin brilliantly in the great APOCALYPSE NOW.
Sheen's excessive demeanor do not help the audience accept him as a
mastermind villain and comes as a surprise considering his extensive career
in film.  
Many other elements conspire with the disappointing script and abundant
special effects to drag SPAWN down.  MTV-style, jerky, in-your-face editing
is one of them.  Flames, for example, roll across the screen sometimes to
announce a shift in setting.  Cogliostro, unlikely wannabe guide for Spawn,
serves as a poor narrator for the film.  He goofily tells the audience, at
one point, that "how much of [Spawn's] humanity is left remains to be
seen," as if the audience really cares as one violent sequence leads to
another.  The music, finally, assaults the audience as much as the manic
violence and offensive dialogue.  Loud and obnoxious hard rock fused with
drum loops dominate some scenes.  To be fair, however, Marilyn Manson's
"Long Hard Road Out of Hell" effectively compliments Spawn's return to
Earth, while Filter and the Crystal Method's "(Can't You) Trip Like I Do"
proves a surprisingly fitting theme song.
For as good a comic book as it is, "Spawn" did not spawn a good movie.
SPAWN, instead, suffers from too much pomp and circumstance, and too little
plot and character development.  It receives two stars for its technically
well-done special effects.  Many other films, though, have equal, if not
superior, special effects and are much better.  Rated PG-13, SPAWN seems
more violent than many R-rated movies and probably wouldn't be appropriate
for the very young.

Title
Review for Virtual Seduction (1995) (TV)
Story by Michelle Gamble-Risley and William Widmaier.  
Screenplay by Michelle Gamble-Risley, William Widmaier, and Paul Ziller.  
Directed by Paul Ziller.  
Starring Jeff Fahey, Ami Dolenz, Carrie Genzel, Meshach Taylor.  
Rated R (contains nudity, violence, and profanity)  89 mins.
Synopsis:  A man whose lover, Paris, was murdered agrees to test out an
experimental virtual reality home unit system.  The subject escapes from
the real world and his current girlfriend, Laura, and becomes addicted to
virtual reality, which, due to a design flaw in his unit, recreates the
dead Paris.  
Comments:  VIRTUAL SEDUCTION, executive produced by Roger Corman and Lance
H. Robbins, serves as a cheaply-made precursor to STRANGE DAYS, a far
superior film.  Both movies deal with desperate men who have trouble
relating to their current lovers because they are (ab)using technology to
be with former lovers (in STRANGE DAYS, the technology utilized recorded
dreams rather than virtual reality).  Interestingly, both films also take
place a couple of years from now during the turn of the new millenium,
though STRANGE DAYS uses the setting far more effectively.  This
exemplifies the problem with VIRTUAL SEDUCTION.  It's not bad for what it
is: low-budget science fiction concerning the psychological dangers of
virtual reality.  Unfortunately, it's been done before and since in much
better films, a fact which ultimately leaves the sci-fi fan bored by this
movie.  
VIRTUAL SEDUCTION has many faults (one of them is the fact that the video
inexplicably has its own trailer before it begins).  The film's script
explores the possibilities of virtual reality interestingly at first, but
its treatment of the subject matter gets heavy-handed and wooden as the
movie progresses.  Many important scenes seem too dark; the lighting could
have been improved significantly.  The cast, a collection of veteran
B-movie actors and sitcom regulars, do only a mediocre job in their roles.
Jeff Fahey, of the original LAWNMOWER MAN, convincingly, though
unenergetically, plays the lead character.  Carrie Genzel plays Paris, the
VR lover, but Ami Dolenz, as the current love interest, seems like a much
more interesting and attractive character with a caring personality, which
doesn't lend credence to the film's premise.  Meschach Taylor, of the once
popular DESIGNING WOMEN sitcom, adequately plays a scientist working on the
project, but his performance isn't something to write home about either.  
VIRTUAL SEDUCTION is one of those harmless movies to which you could do
some light manual labor and not mind having it on in the background.  In
other words, one could fold laundry while glancing up at it every now and
then, but it's rather boring to just sit and watch.  The movie is
surprisingly not as violent as one expects from B-movies in this genre, but
it is still an adult R-rated film due to sexual situations and a suicide
attempt.  This turkey, ultimately, isn't awful, but it's not particularly
interesting or unique either.  Don't be seduced into watching this movie
unless you've got several loads of laundry and nothing else to watch.  

Title
Review for Below Utopia (1997)
BODY COUNT (1997)
A film review by Justin Felix.  
Copyright 1999 Justin Felix.  
Any comments about this review?  Contact me at justinfelix@yahoo.com  
All of my film reviews are archived at
http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Justin+Felix 
Written by David Diamond and Richard Shepard.  
Directed by Kurt Voss.  
Starring Alyssa Milano and Ice-T.  
Rated R (contains violence, profanity, and sexuality)  88 mins.  
Synopsis:  Nice girl Susanne has sex with her boyfriend Daniel in his car,
visits Daniel's rich family during Thanksgiving at their mansion in the
middle of nowhere, and has sex with Daniel again in the basement.  Susanne
and Daniel must then decide where to hide from evil art thieves who shoot
everyone else in the mansion to steal paintings.  Brace yourself for one of
those painfully obvious "surprise endings."  
Comments:  Thanksgiving.  For most, it's a time to be with your loved ones
and enjoy a good, home-cooked meal.  For the makers of BODY COUNT, however,
Thanksgiving is a time for multiple murders, violence, profanity, family
dysfunction, and sex.  Boy, do I feel all the more better having sat through
this crap.  
Alyssa Milano, the former child star of WHO'S THE BOSS?, matures to
made-for-video sludge like this movie.  Someone somewhere thought it'd be a
great idea to pair her with rapper Ice-T, who has since guest-starred in the
made-for-the-Sci-Fi-Channel series WELCOME TO PARADOX.  This isn't exactly a
winning combination.  
Outside of permanently ruining a holiday for me, what else may be said for
this turkey?  Well, it teaches us that beautiful, attractive women who look
strikingly like Alyssa Milano fall in love with nerds who drive down long
winding roads with their eyes closed and complain about being English
teachers.  It presents us with a heartwarming Thanksgiving dinner attended
by alcoholic, stuck-up rich white people waited on by black servants.  It
shows us that old guys, try not to laugh, sit around and talk about "the
appeal of postmodernism" during their free time.  And, it proves that you
can have sex in your parents' basement when they have a dozen or so guests
over, and no one will notice.  
Before I go any further, if any young male reading this has hopes of seeing
Alyssa naked, forget it.  The filmmakers cleverly shoot the simulated sex
scenes in a manner that makes sure you don't see any of Milano's attributes.
They do, however, inexplicably throw in a scene where Ice-T whistles "Jingle
Bells" after killing people, for whatever that's worth.  
This film was originally titled BELOW UTOPIA.  Perhaps they should have
renamed it HELL.  Avoid this clunker.  

Title
Review for Grave, The (1996)
Story by Jonas Pate, Josh Pate, Michael Wexler, Peter Glatzer.  
Screenplay by Jonas Pate and Josh Pate.  
Directed by Jonas Pate.  
Starring Craig Scheffer, Gabrielle Anwar, Josh Charles.  
Rated R (contains violence and profanity)  90 mins.
Synopsis:  A raspy-voiced prisoner about to be executed tells a priest a
story about a bunch of exconvicts, parolees, and crooked cops who plunder
graves to find the key to a fortune.
Comments:  THE GRAVE runs like a movie-length episode of "Tales from the
Crypt."  Whether or not you like this movie would depend largely upon
whether or not you like the gory antics, which are often played humorously,
of the Cryptkeeper's comic book stories.  It's certainly not for everyone.
THE GRAVE, like one of those fables from "Tales from the Crypt," features
dumb-as-rocks, surreal characters who greedily screw each other over to
gain treasure.  The plot's mystery is laughably, almost painfully, obvious.
 The humor, dark as it is, comes from watching despicable characters bumble
around, trying to figure out things which normal people would easily grasp.
 One must throw realism out the door to appreciate a movie like this.  
THE GRAVE, once the shadowy narrator has begun the tale, opens in North
Carolina.  Upon hearing about a grave which holds the key to buried
treasure, two convicts escape their prison and trek around the countryside
in a mini-odyssey to get to this grave.  One of them doesn't make it far
due to a gunshot wound.  In the meantime, a number of dimwitted characters
come in and out of the picture.  Each one has a remarkedly disgusting tale
to tell, but most of them, surprisingly, have something rather insightful
to say somewhere in their blatherings.
The storyline, though inconceivably unrealistic (the convicts, for example,
*easily* escape prison and hang out in obvious places which authorities
would check out), plays out interestingly enough.  The secret of the grave
is comically apparent even though it takes three moonlit trips to the
graveyard for the bad guys to figure it out.  The mystery of the narrator's
identity will keep most people guessing until it's revealed at the end,
though.
The actors do a suitable job for a film of this nature.  They seem
universally unappealing, which is exactly how they should be viewed.  The
attractive B-movie actress Gabrielle Anwar does a particularly nice job
portraying the smarmy girlfriend of one of the convicts.  Veteran film
actors Anthony Michael Hall and Eric Roberts also put in enjoyable
performances here.  
Even if one likes films of this genre (a suspense film, bordering on
comedy, populated by anti-heroes in darkly cartoonish situations), he would
find faults with this movie.  Some of the scenes which try to be morbidly
humorous fall flat.  Plus, the exaggerated country / Southern dialects
become tired at times and prove hard to follow at other times.  
All in all, however, THE GRAVE is an entertaining cheap turkey for those
who like black comedy.  Between the goofy hick characters and the
soundtrack (a catchy, eclectic mix of fiddles, banjos, guitars, mandolins,
and harmonicas), it seems somewhat unique.  I'll give it a qualified,
passing recommendation.

Title
Review for Sleepy Hollow (1999)
All of my film reviews are archived at 
http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Justin+Felix
This review has been submitted to The Shrubbery  
http://www.theshrubbery.com
Any comments about this review?  E-mail me at justinfelix@yahoo.com
Screen story by Kevin Yagher and Andrew Kevin Walker. 
Inspired by the short story THE LEGEND OF SLEEPY HOLLOW by Washington 
Irving. 
Starring Johnny Depp, Christina Ricci, and Casper Van Dien. 
Special appearances by Christopher Lee and Christopher Walken. 
Synopsis:  Investigator Ichabod Crane journeys to 1799 Sleepy Hollow to 
investigate a series of murders involving decapitation.  Townspeople 
believe the spirit of a dead German mercenary is threatening them.  Cute 
blonde Katrina and a listless orphan help Crane solve the mystery. 
Comments:  Tim Burton has directed a number of entertaining and 
groundbreaking films over the years.  BATMAN, of course, is perhaps his 
best-known film and led to a string of less successful sequels.  He's 
done biographical work (on the director ED WOOD), children's movies 
(NIGHTMARE BEFORE CHRISTMAS), and a homage to alien invasion movies 
(MARS ATTACKS!).  SLEEPY HOLLOW, his newest feature which fans have been 
anticipating for a while, shares the similar dark and atmospheric style 
of his earlier work and counts among his better movies. 
SLEEPY HOLLOW quite obviously draws its inspiration from the old period 
horror films of the 1950s and 1960s, especially Hammer Studios' 
reworkings of DRACULA and FRANKENSTEIN, and American International's 
series of movies based on the works of Edgar Allan Poe.  Christopher 
Lee, in fact, star of many Hammer productions over the years, appears at 
the beginning of SLEEPY HOLLOW as a judge who sends Ichabod Crane out to 
investigate the murders.  The movie also borrows from the Universal 
monster movies of the 1930s.  One of the climatic scenes involves a 
windmill and obviously takes its cue from FRANKENSTEIN. 
I mention these allusions for a reason.  Seasoned horror film fans, 
including myself, will smile at their inclusion in this film.  With the 
recent disappointments in theatrically released horror movies, 
especially THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT (the most overblown turkey of the 
decade), we needed a film like this.  Not only does it have a sense of 
history, but Burton's skillful use of setting and mood make this an 
entertaining exercise in horror.  The film's eerie landscapes and foggy 
towns, indeed, overshadow the actors and the plot as the most noteworthy 
aspect of the movie. 
Johnny Depp, a veteran Tim Burton actor who has appeared both in ED WOOD 
and EDWARD SCISSORHANDS, plays Ichabod Crane, who has apparently changed 
occupations from Irving's original story and is now an investigator.  
Depp is adequate in his role.  No more; no less.  Equally adequate is 
Christina Ricci, who plays the love interest in the film.  She's a good 
witch too.  How cute.  One of the few weak parts of SLEEPY HOLLOW is the 
wooden and cliched dialogue between the main characters.  The two 
actors, however, carry the movie well enough, but the supporting cast is 
what makes this movie shine.  Veteran actors such as Jeffrey Jones and 
Michael Gough (who played the butler Alfred in all four recent BATMAN 
flicks) are terrific as the aging townsfolk involved in the conspiracy 
which Depp uncovers.  While I do not wish to reveal crucial plot points, 
I can say that the storyline becomes quite confusing.  You have to pay 
attention.  Andrew Kevin Walker wrote the screenplay.  He's the one who 
also wrote 8 MM and SEVEN.  Walker is quickly becoming one of the 
premiere suspense writers in Hollywood, and SLEEPY HOLLOW certainly 
doesn't hurt his growing reputation. 
As one might imagine from a gentleman like Walker, SLEEPY HOLLOW is 
quite graphic.  There's a lot of blood and a lot of beheadings.  This is 
definately not a flick to take the young kids to.  A lady in front of us 
took her two young sons to see it and spent about 25 - 30 minutes 
covering the youngest's eyes with her hand.  He was obviously upset by 
the movie's intense violence.  If you're looking for a good scare, 
however, SLEEPY HOLLOW is definately recommended. 

Title
Review for Watchers Reborn (1998)
WATCHERS REBORN (1998)  
A film review by Justin Felix.  
Copyright 1999 Justin Felix.  
All of my film reviews are archived at
http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Justin+Felix  
This review also appears in the Shrubbery at
http://www.theshrubbery.prohosting.com/0299/movie3.html
Screenplay by Sean Dash.  
Based upon the novel WATCHERS by Dean Koontz.  
Directed by John Carl Buechler.  
Starring Mark Hamill, Lou Rawls, Kane Hodder, Lisa Wilcox.  
Rated R (contains violence and profanity)  83 mins.  
Synopsis:  A humorless police officer's life changes when he befriends a
super-smart, super-adorable golden retriever named Einstein and a cute,
young blond scientist.  Unfortunately, Einstein shares a psychic link with a
bigfoot-sized ape-creature trained by the blond scientist to be an
unstoppable killing machine, and this rogaine-nightmare is loose and after
the dog and the girl.  Meanwhile, a group of white, chain-smoking,
gun-toting NSA agents in sunglasses and business suits tries to kill all the
other characters in the movie.
Comments:  WATCHERS REBORN, a cheaply made direct-to-video turkey, is the
fourth sequel to the first film version of Dean Koontz's bestselling novel
WATCHERS.  Technically, this should have been called WATCHERS V, but it
seems that this cycle of horror movies, much like many other sequel-crazy
film series, has decided to drop the numbers from the titles.  (Even the
Star Trek movies dropped the numbers from their titles after STAR TREK VI.)
The makers of WATCHERS REBORN probably want to fool unsuspecting video
rental customers into thinking this might be a good movie instead of a
crappy fifth installment of a film series which should have died a long time
ago.
This really isn't a good movie.  Have you ever rented a movie and recieved a
sinking feeling about it when you watched the previews preceding the feature
presentation?  Well, any hope a viewer may have had, perhaps because he is a
fan of novelist Dean Koontz or actor Mark Hamill, will be dashed by the time
he's seen the trailers tagged on before the beginning of WATCHERS REBORN.
They're awful.  These commercials cover films like a strange stripper movie
called SHADOW DANCER, some weird crap about a dead Indian, teens, and
wolves, and an "action" movie called DETONATOR starring Scott Baio.  Scott
Baio!  What idiot dreamed this movie up?  
After surviving these abysmal trailers, the person finally gets to watch the
movie he rented: WATCHERS REBORN.  "Maybe it won't be *that* bad" he may say
to himself.  "Perhaps, just perhaps, the bottom-of-the-barrel film fluff
advertised before it is greatly misleading.  WATCHERS REBORN, after all, is
based on that cool book Dean Koontz wrote a decade ago.  It stars Mark
Hamill -- Luke Skywalker himself from that terrific STAR WARS trilogy.  Lou
Rawls is even in the mix!"
Unfortunately, the Force is certainly no longer with Mark Hamill (he looks
very sick here), and this movie shares only basic plot elements with
WATCHERS, the book.  The latter is really too bad.  Koontz is a hack writer
producing way too many thrillers for his own good, but he is still my
favorite hack writer.  Koontz has a writing style which is succinct and
suspenseful.  People who read many of his books, however, often complain of
repetitive plot devices.  It's definately not a Koontz book if there isn't
(1) a psychic, (2) a super-intelligent dog, or (3) a psychotic killer who
likes ripping out people's eyeballs.  WATCHERS has all three devices, which
may explain why it's arguably the most popular of Koontz's books.  The idea
behind Koontz's novel, though highly implausible, is very interesting.
Basically, a biological war machine is created: a smart dog can be released
in battle, track down its target, and then relay the target's position,
psychically, to a large creature designed to kill in hand-to-hand combat.
Silly but kind of neat too.  
I'm sorry.  I don't mean to ramble on about matters not directly linked to
WATCHERS REBORN, the movie.  I suppose I just don't want to talk about the
movie itself.  This turkey is really cheesy.  No one in this movie can act,
including Mark Hamill, and it's difficult seeing the aged Luke Skywalker
stumble around trying to be the hero.  The cheese factor is only increased
when he's involved in an implied sex scene with the blond biologist /
geneticist / zoologist / whatever-the-f**k-she's-supposed-to-be whom he
befriends.  Mercifully, the filmmakers opted not to do nudity.  To be
honest, the only half-convincing actor in the film is the golden retriever
who plays Einstein.  You know a movie is bad when a dog outacts all of its
human counterparts.  
I find it difficult to relate how laughable the action sequences are in this
movie.  And the creature!  Yes, the creature out after poor Einstein is some
guy in a furry suit and a mask which poorly imitates the werewolves in THE
HOWLING.  This creature is shot about 500,000 times, but it's okay.  The
creature has the ability to kill people by swinging his arms around and
pushing.  Oh, he can also rip body parts off, allowing for many scenes of
fake hands and arms being thrown around.  Cheesy gore.  That's another main
element of WATCHERS REBORN.  It has many bloody scenes which are thoroughly
unconvincing and only increase the film's campiness rather than its suspense.
Ultimately, I gave WATCHERS REBORN a star and a half because bad horror /
sci-fi film buffs may get a few kicks out of the film's silliness (though
this film will tax even their patience -- it's an 83 minute film, but it
feels like four hours).  Also, I hate to admit, I have survived far worse
than this.  Anyone who has sat through the Christopher Lambert and Natasha
Henstridge debacle known as ADRENALIN: FEAR THE RUSH will know what I mean.
Finally, I couldn't help but think that WATCHERS REBORN would work well as
"bot fodder" for the creative folks behind one of my all-time favorite
shows, "Mystery Science Theater 3000."  This thought alone helped me survive
WATCHERS REBORN with a smile on my face.
Rated R, WATCHERS REBORN contains dozens of blood-spattered bodies and
unconvincing gore.  It also has violence, obviously.  I wouldn't recommend
it for the little kids, but I'm sure even young teens would make it through
this movie okay.  Instead of watching this film, however, I recommend
reading Koontz's book.  Trust me, it'll be time much, much better spent.

Title
Review for Varsity Blues (1999)
VARSITY BLUES (1999)
A film review by Justin Felix.  
Copyright 1999 Justin Felix.  
This review also appears in the Shrubbery at
http://www.theshrubbery.prohosting.com/0399/movie2.html
All of my film reviews are achived at
http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Justin+Felix 
Written by W. Peter Iliff.  
Directed by Brian Robbins.  
Starring James Van Der Beek and Jon Voight.  
Rated R (contains violence, profanity, nudity, and drug abuse)  104 mins.  
Synopsis:  Back-up quarterback Moxxon becomes starting quarterback midway
through his senior year of high school, even though he'd rather read
"Slaughterhouse Five" than the playbook.  Evil football coach Kilmer throws
away Moxxon's book, though, while the evil team physician injects
painkillers into the players.  In the meantime, Moxxon's kid brother forms a
cult, and a bubblegum-blond cheerleader smears whip cream on herself to
seduce the new star quarterback.  
Comments:  Since I usually review horror and science fiction films, I feel a
little out of my league discussing this teen football movie.  (Pun intended.
Thank you!)  VARSITY BLUES was produced by MTV, and it really shows.
Several extended scenes allow for a continual soundtrack of mediocre pop
songs meant to appeal to the adolescent male audience this crap was intended
for.  The teenagers all have reasons for their melodramatic angst.  The
adults all have problems, of course, and, as one-dimensional characters,
they are all fanatically obssessed with how their local high school football
team performs.
Yes, this movie represents high school life in MTV-Land.  This is a land
where your health teacher is also a part-time stripper, your ice cream store
attendant girlfriend wears an Egyptian Ankh around her neck, your kid
brother forms a "cute" cult, your football coach is an uncaring, obssessive
madman, and your friends' lives consist of nothing but getting laid and
driving around in cop cars naked.  All you, as the main character, want to
do, however, is read "Slaughterhouse Five" and attend Brown University in
the Fall.  Well, at least this is a little more realistic than MTV's "The
Real World."  
VARSITY BLUES stars James Van Der Beek, this week's teen TV star making the
leap to the big screen.  He plays the hick Moxxon adequately, though some of
his emotional dialogue will make people chuckle.  ("You dawn't own mah
life!"  Who would want to?)  Jon Voight, the stock evil guy in countless
other movies, is, surprise, the stock evil guy here.  But is he really evil,
or is he a product of society?  After all, everybody, young and old, in this
movie has no life whatsoever and do nothing but obssess over high school
football.  Maybe the pressures of the 90 screaming fans at the football
field drove evil coach Kilmer evil.  The film's screenplay never answers
this burning question.  At times, Iliff's story does show glimmers of
touching or humorous scenes, but, before the audience gets their hopes up
that there might be something redeeming in this movie, they get trashed with
another lengthy party sequence or overwrought football game.  The movie's
pacing is slow, and the plot turns are mindnumbingly obvious from start to
finish.
I suppose I'm being a little hard on VARSITY BLUES.  Maybe I'm just a little
miffed that I had to pay 3 bucks to see it, even though it was dollar night
at the cinema.  Something about a request from the studio made the theater
charge more money.  I found the film oftentimes ludicrous and boring.  Three
guys in front of us smuggled beer into the the theater.  I wished I had
thought of that.  Alcohol, lots of it, may have helped the viewing experience.  

Title
Review for Sliver (1993)
Screenplay by Joe Eszterhas.  
Based on a novel by Ira Levin.  
Directed by Philip Noyce.  
Starring Sharon Stone, William Baldwin, Tom Berenger, Martin Landau.  
Unrated version (contains nudity, violence, and profanity)  108 mins.  
Synopsis:  Carly, a divorced, unhappy, 35-year-old book editor who must
work with intensely annoying, sex-starved Judy, moves into a dream
apartment where she meets an elderly, lonely professor and a has-been
novelist who likes to scare jogging women in Central Park.  Carly then
begins an affair with a young technogeek while a bunch of people are
murdered in the apartment building and someone watches it all with video
cameras.
Comments:  Three stars may be giving SLIVER a little more credit than it
deserves.  It's a big-budget turkey slammed by many critics when it was
first released, I won't deny.  Despite its many faults, however, SLIVER
does warrant a second look.
How do I come to that conclusion?  Though it is sometimes compared to REAR
WINDOW (and I do see the resemblance), SLIVER's plot still strikes me as
unique.  In fact, the interesting plot makes one want the movie to be
better than it really is.  I have never read a novel by Ira Levin (who
wrote the book from which this film is based), but Levin's work has
provided the basis for a number of classic science fiction and horror
movies over the years, most notably ROSEMARY'S BABY and THE STEPFORD WIVES
and its inevitable sequels.  SLIVER deals with a dark subject, voyeurism,
and the chilling possibilities open to a voyeur with developing
technologies.  Allow me to suggest, for a moment, something which I rarely
see suggested about SLIVER.  Yes, it is obviously an erotic thriller
(Sharon Stone strips naked frequently and makes out with William Baldwin
while a murderer runs around cancelling out his victims), but it is also a
science fiction film.  Good science fiction often takes a part (a sliver,
if you'll accept a bad pun) of modern day society and exaggerates it.  In
SLIVER, the apartment's owner secretly installs video cameras in every room
of the building for the express purpose of spying on his tenants.  Sitting
in an enclosed room, he watches over these people as if he were God.  Two
walls of television sets, a giant TV in the center, a computer console, and
a remote control make up the majority of his equipment, which apparently
set him back 6 million dollars.  He can zoom in and out on everyone, and
record anything which goes on.  This massive invasion of privacy is
frightening when thought about (imagine every moment in every day of your
life being secretly filmed), and it is here where a major motif of science
fiction resides: the dangers of emerging technologies put to unethical use.
The novelty of the storyline, however, does not excuse Joe Eszterhas's weak
screenplay.  SLIVER is riddled with poor dialogue.  Granted, poor dialogue
can sometimes be unintentionally funny, but in SLIVER's case, Eszterhas
tries to be clever and funny intentionally.  The lines, therefore, only end
up receiving groans from the audience.  Carly and another tenant discuss
moving in an early scene, for example, and the tenant says moving is "worse
than anal intercourse."  They share a chuckle.  The audience doesn't.  Or,
how about this for awful?  Judy, the most annoying coworker to ever stumble
into a movie (get down on your knees and *pray* you never have to work with
someone like Judy), suggests "Pearl Jam [is] some sort of oriental sex
thing."  Ugh!
Another criticism of SLIVER is that it moves too slowly during the first
half.  To be honest, I'm not sure if the screenwriter or the director is at
fault, or if the reason lies in the fact that I'm reviewing the unrated
version over the R-rated theatrical version (from my estimate, though, only
about a minute was added to the unrated version).  Carly's introductions to
the main characters feel contrived, and her "steamy" scenes both with Zeke
Hawkins (Baldwin) and without are drawn out much longer than they need to
be.  
For an erotic thriller, SLIVER possesses a very talented and experienced
cast of actors.  Sharon Stone ... well, she's Sharon Stone, and she
delivers what you'd expect to see after her career-making performance in
BASIC INSTINCT.  William Baldwin looks like a geeky freak, which is good
considering the sleazy character he plays, and he turns in a goofy but
enjoyable performance.  Veteran actors Tom Berenger and Martin Landau seem
to make the best out of their characters (they really aren't offered much
thanks to the script).
I cannot conclude this review without mentioning the music.  I don't
normally have much to say about a film's score or songs, but SLIVER
effectively uses a number of dance standards during several key sequences.
Most notably, Enigma's "Carly's Loneliness" and UB40's "Can't Help Falling
in Love" appear a number of times and serve as fitting themes for Carly and
Zeke respectively.
SLIVER certainly has its faults: a slow first half, bad dialogue, and, at
times, annoying characters (Judy, for instance).  However, a strong
concept, a mostly solid cast, and some well-chosen music almost saves it
from being a turkey and at least makes the film watchable.  The R-rated
version may flow a little quicker than the unrated version reviewed here (I
saw the R-rated version in the theater when it first came out, so it's been
way too long for me to confidently compare the two).  SLIVER also has one
of the more memorable endings to a thriller that I've ever seen, which is a
definate plus because I usually find the conclusions to thrillers cliched
and disappointing.  Some people I know who have seen this turkey hate it,
but I really don't think it's all *that* bad.  I'd give it a passing
recommendation, but keep in mind that it's certainly not family viewing.

Title
Review for Danger Island (1992) (TV)
THE PRESENCE (1992)  
A film review by Justin Felix.  
Copyright 1999 Justin Felix.  
Any comments about this review?  Contact me at justinfelix@yahoo.com  
All of my film reviews are archived at
http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Justin+Felix 
Written by William Bleich.  
Directed by Tommy Lee Wallace.  
Starring Gary Graham, Kathy Ireland, and June Lockhart.  
Rated PG-13 (contains violence)  97 mins.  
Synopsis:  A whole bunch of people flee an unspecified country and an
unspecified skirmish in a plane.  They crashland near an unspecified island,
where they discover that an unspecified group of scientists working for
unspecified employers have experimented with biological weapons.  
Comments:  Even though THE PRESENCE is packaged as a real movie with a real
movie rating (PG-13), it becomes patently obvious early on that this is a
made-for-TV movie, and if you stick around until the end of the credits,
you'll discover that NBC was responsible for this fluff.  It's not bad fluff
really, as far as cheesy science fiction and TV movies go.  Corny dialogue
and poor acting are plentiful, so you'll have lots to laugh at.  If not, the
creature at the end of the film will make you chuckle:  a slow-moving guy in
a rubber suit slightly reminiscent of the Gill Man in the 1950s classic
CREATURE FROM THE BLACK LAGOON.  
As I said, this is NBC's version of a science fiction thriller, and what a
version it is!  THE PRESENCE opens with bikini-clad supermodels who read
Shakespeare's THE TEMPEST during a photo shoot in what is apparently a war
zone.  Most of the film takes place on a giant island with huge research
facilities which haven't been touched since the mid-1970s and some sort of
native tribe who, despite their primitive ways, can produce supermodels with
surprisingly well-conditioned hair.  And through it all, an aged June
Lockhart (from the old LOST IN SPACE TV series) stands around and offers to
make coffee.  This is a very, very bad movie, but a fairly fun and funny
B-movie.  Wipe the dust off this box at your local video store and check it
out.  

Title
Review for Wild Things (1998)
Written by Stephen Peters.  
Directed by John McNaughton.  
Starring Kevin Bacon, Matt Dillon, Neve Campbell, Denise Richards, Bill
Murray, Robert Wagner.  
Rated R (contains nudity, profanity, and violence)  116 mins.  
Synopsis:  A wild teen-aged girl with an IQ around 200 manipulates a beefy
guidance counselor, a determined police detective, two trial lawyers, the
U.S. judicial system, the news media, a millionaire playgirl, and her
supersexy teen-aged daughter in an elaborate scheme to swindle millions of
dollars.  
Comments:  For this week, I have decided to review a movie currently
playing in theaters rather than an almost forgotten video collecting dust
in the far corner of a rental outlet.  This may become a trend as SPECIES
2, a sequel to one of the best bad sci-fi films of the decade, is set to be
released this Friday (April 10, 1998).
Anyway, this week's turkey is the sleazy, exploitative WILD THINGS, a film
which shares quite a number of conventions with many of the B-level,
direct-to-video-or-cable thrillers I have reviewed in the past.  The movie,
in fact, only possesses one noticeable difference: it has an all-star cast.
Let's be blunt for a moment.  Veteran film actors Kevin Bacon and Matt
Dillon are technically the main stars here; they are listed first in the
credits and the majority of the film's running time favors them.  WILD
THINGS' producers, however, heavily advertised this movie as an erotic
exercise between rising stars Neve Campbell and Denise Richards.  The movie
posters prominently feature the two rising out of a pool of water and
staring at the viewer with sultry gazes.  I suspect the target audience for
this film was predominantly younger males; though, surprisingly, the
matinee showing I attended with my friend had an audience with far more
women than men.  If one's only reason to see WILD THINGS is to see Ms.
Campbell and Ms. Richards get it on, then one will be remarkedly
disappointed.  A menage a trois does occur between the two ladies and Matt
Dillon, but it is a poorly-lit, seemingly superfluous scene.  The two also
kiss a couple of times, but it feels mechanic and obligatory rather than
racy as it was intended.  Neve Campbell, by the way, does not strip naked
at all.  Sorry, guys.
WILD THINGS' advertised sexual fireworks fizzle here, but the movie itself,
as bad movies go, is quite entertaining.  The actors turn in hammy
performances (more on this in a bit), and the surprisingly complex script
keeps the viewer guessing while the laughable dialogue is full of cheesy
lines undercutting the seriousness of the subject matter.  My friend and I
chuckled throughout the movie, but the rest of the audience didn't seem to
be in on it.  Don't go see WILD THINGS expecting a run-of-the-mill suspense
film.  (It's an amusing exercise in sleaze populated with comically
self-absorbed, greedy characters who all get what they deserve in the end.)  
Part of the film's qualified success comes from its cast.  A number of
fine, first-rate actors have fun with their characters.  The attractive,
young actress Denise Richards, of last year's megabudget STARSHIP TROOPERS,
nearly steals the show here as the pouty high-school student with a
supermodel body who catches everyone's eyes.  Neve Campbell, the scream
queen of SCREAM and SCREAM 2, drops her innocent, damsel-in-distress
routine and turns 180 degrees in her role as the trailer trash girl who
secretly instigates everything.  The best supporting nods go to Bill Murray
and Robert Wagner, both making surprise appearances in this, an atypical
film for either of them.  Bill Murray, in particular, is great as the
fraud-obsessed lawyer who can sniff a lawsuit from a mile away.  Robert
Wagner is hilarious in his wooden portrayal of another lawyer.  He seems to
be doing a self-parody of himself which reminds me of his brief role in the
John Candy vehicle DELIRIOUS.  
Despite its humorous dialogue and delightfully smarmy actors, WILD THINGS
cannot be excused for some of its shortcomings.  While the first two-thirds
of the movie moves at a breakneck pace, the last third becomes tired.
Without revealing too much, one character will kill another only to be
killed by someone else.  It becomes a cycle which tries the audience's
patience.  Also, though this film is designed to be unexpectedly funny, a
subplot deals with an affair that a guidance counselor has with two of his
students.  This seems inexcusably unethical and borders on pedophilia (the
students, to give WILD THINGS the benefit of the doubt, may be 18).  The
audience should feel uneasy when they realize they are viewing what is
supposed to be a sexual affair between a high school teacher and his
students.  
WILD THINGS ends on a somewhat unique note.  Important background
flashbacks are interspersed throughout the closing credits, and they are
rather fun to watch.  So, don't get up and walk out the theater as soon as
you see the closing credits start to roll at the end.
All in all, WILD THINGS is a pretty good and humorous turkey.  It's
certainly not for everyone, but for those who are into exploitative
thrillers like BASIC INSTINCT or SLIVER, you could find a lot worse than
this.  

Title
Review for Adrenalin: Fear the Rush (1996)
ADRENALIN: FEAR THE RUSH (1996)
A "Turkey of the Week" film review by Justin Felix
Copyright 1998 Justin Felix
Written and directed by Albert Pyun
Starring Christopher Lambert, Natasha Henstridge
Rated R (contains violence and profanity)  76 minutes
Synopsis:  A maniac, crazed by virulent microphage, slaughters more than
twenty people, including a street gang and heavily-armed troops, with a
small knife.  Even with a handgun, however, he can't take out the two cops
who are after him, despite having shot one of them a total of seven times.
Comments:  The most notable aspect of ADRENALIN: FEAR THE RUSH is that it
marks a striking career move for Natasha Henstridge.  Not only does she
manage to keep all her clothes on (her trademark in earlier films such as
SPECIES and MAXIMUM RISK was to strip naked as often as possible), but she
actually puts on even more clothes as the film progresses.  This will
probably disappoint many Henstridge fans, but I welcome the change because
Henstridge is an attractive, capable actress who deserves less exploitative
roles (though, I admit, it doesn't show in this mess).  Henstridge, just
like every other actor in the film, delivers a wooden performance in this
monumental turkey.  (The cast also includes Christopher Lambert, who has
appeared in the HIGHLANDER and MORTAL KOMBAT films.)  How on Earth this
movie got two big-name stars to appear in it is beyond me.
ADRENALIN: FEAR THE RUSH is set in Boston ten years in the future (2007).
Boston has changed dramatically in those ten years.  It is now home to a
bunch of interred foreigners and policed by cops who drive around in small
cars with "policia" printed on their doors.  Some guy has a really bad
virus, and he's killing people because of it.  So, the brave good guys
(Lambert and Henstridge) go after him.  That's it.  76 minutes never seemed
so long.  This is a drawn-out chase scene through dimly-lit abandoned
buildings turned into an entire movie.  The plot development is nil; we
learn absolutely nothing about Lambert's character and very little about
Henstridge's character.  The dialogue is littered with unnecessary
obscenities and concerns mindnumbingly idiotic arguments over who will go
down the next dark corridor/tunnel/airduct next and who will carry the
flashlight.
A subplot does exist involving Henstridge's character's illegal attempt to
get her son out of Boston.  In her opening monologue, a monologue which
sounds as though Henstridge was reading from cue cards, we learn that she
has gone to great lengths to secure a fake passport for her son.  Twenty
minutes into the film, I wondered if the movie would have been better if it
focused on this plot.  In a defining scene of the movie, however, I changed
my mind.  This fake passport drops to the ground.  Lambert's cop
immediately recognizes it as a fraud from six feet away.  Must not have
been a good fake.  This emphasizes another fault with the film.  Things
just defy common sense.  Lambert's cop, for instance, is shot seven times,
yet he is still able to talk and slide about.
ADRENALIN: FEAR THE RUSH ends in a trite manner that doesn't seem to even
fit the mood that the filmmakers were trying for.  I found myself rather
bored with this film, which will disappoint both sci-fi/horror fans and
fans of Henstridge and Lambert.  Don't fear the rush.  Fear the movie.
Watch something else.

Title
Review for Ex, The (1997)
Based on a novel by John Lutz.  
Screenplay by Larry Cohen and John Lutz.  
Directed by Mark L. Lester.  
Starring Yancy Butler, Suzy Amis, Nick Mancuso.  
Rated R (contains violence, nudity, and profanity)  87 mins.  
Synopsis:  Easily-angered, chainsmoking architect David encounters his
homicidal first wife Diedre five years after their divorce.  Diedre easily
cons David's not-so-bright new wife Molly into believing she's a child
psychologist so that she can influence Molly and David's quick-tempered
son, Michael.  Diedre, at the same time, murders a bunch of people.  
Comments:  THE EX is a very bad movie.  I haven't seen a turkey of this
magnitude in quite a while.  I kept vacillating, however, between giving
THE EX one star for its sheer awfulness and three stars for its campy humor
(ultimately, I decided to split the difference and give it two stars).  
As summarized briefly in the synopsis, this is yet another
spurned-psycho-lover-gets-her-revenge type movie.  I'm not sure how many
films have been produced since FATAL ATTRACTION which use this tired
storyline, but it seems like 10,000,000,000.  THE EX, however, though
following many of the standard cliches of this thriller subgenre, differs
slightly from the norm in that, at least, it doesn't take itself too
seriously like so many other duds do (MALICIOUS and STALKED are two
examples which come to mind).  Those involved in the movie realize they're
in a turkey, apparently, and turn in hammy performances which compliment
the ludicrous dialogue contained within the script.  
THE EX's storyline, as I said, incorporates many cliches predominant in
films of its nature; however, the plot is so overwrought and unbelievable
that, after a while, the viewer must accept that logic does not operate in
the realm of the movie.  Diedre, David's first wife, kills and kills and
kills, for example, without ever having to worry about police
investigations and the like (it's not as though she's bright enough not to
leave fingerprints at the scene of the crime).  David and his new wife
Molly have an incredibly difficult time understanding why Michael, their
son, has emotional problems, specifically his inability to control his
anger.  Though David smokes like tomorrow will never come and blows up at
people every other minute in the movie, the connection between him and his
son is not made.  Molly is easily swayed by Diedre into believing she's a
child psychologist and allows the demented woman to spend time with her
son.  Time and time again, things do not add up in this movie.  If a viewer
can't accept this fact, then he will definately not like THE EX.  If, on
the other hand, he can appreciate the movie for its campiness, then he'll
probably like it much better.  
I don't mean to necessarily suggest, however, that THE EX is a memorable
exercise in camp.  Even when viewed from an it's-so-bad-it's-good angle,
this movie isn't all that successful.  THE EX does have its moments,
though, almost all of which involve Yancy Butler (the psychotic Diedre) and
Nick Mancuso (David).  These two actors turn in decidedly hammy
performances which, oftentimes, elicit chuckles from the audience.  The
truly awful lines written for them help this humor along.  Butler gets the
larger portion of bad dialogue; every time her character kills someone, she
has a punchline that's unbelievably inane.  When she murders a tenant of an
apartment she wishes to use to spy on David, for example, Diedre whacks the
elderly lady with a crowbar and states "I'm so sorry, your lease is
terminated."  Or how about when Diedre takes out her therapist in another
ridiculous scene?  (Diedre's therapist wishes to have her recommitted, so
she decides to visit Diedre, alone, in her new apartment -- never
realizing, of course, that it's not her's.  Therapists typically are
catatonically brain-dead in these movies).  Having successfully snuffed the
woman out, Diedre looks at the body and says: "What was it that you always
said to me at the end of each session, Dr. Jones?  Oh, that's right.  'I'm
sorry, but your time is up!'"  This is what passes for humor in the film.
The audience doesn't necessarily laugh but groan (the type of groan that
suggests the audience can't believe they're watching this crap -- although
watching it they are).  Nick Mancuso's chainsmoking, nervous-wreck
character does not have the cheesy lines that Butler's character delivers,
but his ridiculously overdone performance provides for some better comic
relief.  In between drags off his cigarette, for instance, in one of the
movie's best scenes, David tries to explain to his lawyer what a creep his
ex-wife is.  In exaggerated exasperation, he nearly shouts "the woman is a
cuckoo-bird!"  (Trust me, it is funny in context.)  
And so, the movie continues until its painfully obvious conclusion.  I
won't reveal the ending specifically (though anyone remotely familiar with
thrillers of this type could probably guess the ending just from this film
review), but I will say that THE EX has one of the biggest fire hazards
appearing recently in film.  Molly and David own a cabin that becomes
engulfed by flames in approximately three seconds!  Molly, at one point in
the film, not-so-brilliantly observes, after discovering Diedre has moved
into an apartment across from her family's to spy upon them, that "she's
crazy."  You'd be pretty crazy too if you'd rented this turkey.  I'd avoid
it unless it's on TV and you come across it.  If you do, you may want to
watch it, groan at the bad punchlines and stupid plot, and feel good that
you didn't spend money renting it.  

Title
Review for I Still Know What You Did Last Summer (1998)
I STILL KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST SUMMER (1998)
A film review by Justin Felix.  
Copyright 1998 Justin Felix.  
All of my film reviews are archived at
http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Justin+Felix  
This review also appears in the Shrubbery --
http://www.theshrubbery.prohosting.com/0199/movie2.html 
Screenplay by Trey Callaway.  
Directed by Danny Cannon.  
Starring Jennifer Love Hewitt, Brandy, Freddie Prinze Jr., Mekhi Phifer.  
Rated R (contains violence and profanity)  approx. 90 mins.
Synopsis:  Sullen Julie James, still haunted by nightmares of the killer Ben
Willis from I KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST SUMMER, perks up when her new best
friend Karla Wilson wins a trip for four to the Bahamas.  Arriving at the
start of the hurricane season, Julie and Karla run around in very tight
clothing and realize they've walked into a trap set by the rainslickered
slasher with a huge hook for a hand.
Comments:  I may be showing some pop culture illiteracy here, but I have
never seen an episode of the Fox TV series "Party of Five."  I am only
vaguely aware of the show's premise, and my knowledge of it comes from brief
commercials I half-paid attention to while watching the tube.  "Party of
Five," I do know however, seems to be the starting ground for actresses in
the teen horror genre.  Neve Campbell, Scream Queen of the 90s and star of
SCREAM, SCREAM 2, and THE CRAFT, is a regular of the show.  So too is
Jennifer Love Hewitt.  Lo and behold, following in the footsteps of
Campbell, Hewitt now has a horror franchise of her own: the I KNOW WHAT YOU
DID LAST SUMMER line.  Though the original film, released last year, was
watchable enough, this insipid sequel had me looking at the theater's
glowing red EXIT sign longingly throughout.
Jennifer Love Hewitt is a very good-looking young leading lady; however,
unlike Neve Campbell, Hewitt struggles with acting.  She just isn't
convincing in this film (and she wasn't in the original either).  This puts
many young males, including myself, in a paradoxical quandary: she's very
attractive, but the annoying, spoiled, Valley Girl-type character she tries
to play here is annoying to the extreme and ruins many of the scenes which
emphasize, exploitatively, her figure.  Add to the mix the equally pleasant
yet irritating Brandy, another rising teen TV star, and you get one
frustrated male audience.
I've spent so much time on Hewitt and Brandy for a reason.  I STILL KNOW
WHAT YOU DID LAST SUMMER, though cashing in on the success of the original,
ultimately serves as a vehicle for these two young actresses.  Nothing else
here is original or interesting.  This movie, in fact, makes other recent
so-so horror films like URBAN LEGEND and JOHN CARPENTER'S VAMPIRES seem like
stunning works of high art.  I STILL KNOW relies heavily on tired slasher
film cliches: an isolated location, a storm, parentless teenagers, false
alarm nightmares, lots of blue-lighted darkness scenes, a garbed slasher who
walks around in the background without the characters seeing him, knives and
other sharp instruments lying around everywhere, etc.  You get the picture.
The entire audience knows all the secondary characters introduced in the
film are going to receive the business end of the killer's hook.  They may
as well have huge targets painted on them.  Like SCREAM and its numerous
knockoffs, these secondary characters are supposed to serve as comic relief.
Unfortunately, I STILL KNOW's characters aren't all that funny.  In
particular, one character, a chain-weed-smoking guy, is obnoxiously annoying
and certainly doesn't die soon enough.  The death scenes, by the way, are
relatively violent for a theatrically released horror film.  Several of them
are uncomfortable to watch, and they reminded me of the sickening gore
scenes in HELLRAISER: BLOODLINE, a truly sadistic movie.  This, too, did not
help the supposed humor I STILL KNOW was shooting for.
And what is the deal with the slasher himself?  I know that the slasher film
is not a particularly intelligent genre, but Ben Willis has got to go down
as one of the most silly slashers in mainstream horror.  Come on, the guy
looks like the Gorton's fisherman, and his gruff voice makes him sound like
a Disney pirate.  Though his lightning-lit appearances ellicited much-needed
laughter in the theater, his appearance borders on the absurd in the horror
film, and that's *really* saying something.
So, all that's left to talk about here is Jennifer Love Hewitt and Brandy.
Both prance about in tightfitting, revealing outfits or in various states of
undress, yet neither of them ever actually do a nude scene.  Hewitt,
however, does do a post-shower scene in which her thin bathrobe is quite. .
.titillating.  This scene alone made this one-star turkey earn two stars
under my rating system.  Otherwise, Hewitt and Brandy both grate on the
nerves.  Early in the film, for instance, Brandy wins the trip to the
Bahamas.  She and Hewitt jump around and scream and screech for what seems
like forever.  I needed extra-strength Tylenol after that part.  Oh, and the
film's conclusion, talk about repetitive!  People who saw I KNOW WHAT YOU
DID LAST SUMMER will predict I STILL KNOW's ending at least 5 minutes before
it happens.  Boring!
I saw this movie with my brother at the local downtown movie theater.
Admission is only one dollar on Wednesdays, and we often go see bad movies
on these days just to ridicule them.  It's usually a fun thing to do along
with the rest of the audience, who don't seem to mind participating in a
mass "Mystery Science Theater 3000"-type viewing.  I STILL KNOW WHAT YOU DID
LAST SUMMER, however, produced several lengthy uncomfortable silences from
the audience, underscoring how bad it *really* is.  If it weren't for the
main actresses' revealing wardrobes, I'd have had a very, very hard time
sitting through this lame sequel.  I can't imagine trying to watch it on
video (horror films seem 10 times better in a theater because they rely
heavily on audience participation) and wouldn't recommend it to people,
unless they're horror film fanatics or huge fans of Hewitt and Brandy.  I
read on a website somewhere that another sequel is already in the works.
What a depressing thought.  Hewitt apparently needs to spend more time on TV
figuring out how to act.  
Rated R, this film contains lots of violence, several gory scenes, and a
couple nubile, horny teenagers--though the sex act itself is always
thwarted.  I'd say this is unsuitable for kids, but teens wouldn't have a
problem sitting through it, especially since they obviously compose the
film's target audience.

Title
Review for Species II (1998)
Written by Chris Brancato.  
Directed by Peter Medak.  
Starring Michael Madsen, Natasha Henstridge, Marg Helgenberger.  
Rated R (contains nudity, violence, and profanity)  92 mins.  
Synopsis:  A popular astronaut journeys to Mars on a corporate-sponsored
space flight, picks up alien DNA, returns to Earth to have his picture
printed on "Space Flakes" cereal boxes, and mutates into a horny alien
predator.  Meanwhile, Eve, a genetic clone of Sil from the first SPECIES,
gains a psychic connection to the astronaut and fights her "urge to merge"
with him.  Press Lennox and Laura Baker (survivors of SPECIES), along with
a machete-wielding astronaut and a one-eyed colonel, try to stop the
growing alien menace.  
Comments:  Sometimes I really enjoy "Wednesday Dollar Nights" at the local
theater down the street from where I live.  This theater shows second-run
movies, and the cheap admission price is their way of increasing ticket
sales during the sluggish middle of the week.  Every now and then, a
thoroughly awful turkey will play there, and the audience gladly ridicules
it as if they were part of a massive "Mystery Science Theater 3000"
episode.  In recent years, Kent audiences, including myself, have paid a
buck each to bash WES CRAVEN'S NEW NIGHTMARE and ANACONDA.  These
experiences, however, did not prepare me for the laugh riot SPECIES II
engendered last Wednesday as one of the evening's dollar features.  
As a side note, allow me to be one of the few brave enough to admit that
he's seen SPECIES II more than once.  I saw it for the first time on the
Friday it came out (April 10, 1998).  The original SPECIES still stands as
one of the best sci-fi misfires of the decade, and the sequel promised to
be just as awful.  Critics came down fairly hard on SPECIES II, with good
reason.  The movie is terrible; it's a poorly-acted, exploitative film with
a heavy-handed, ludicrous plot full of continuity holes.  SPECIES II,
however, makes no claim to be good.  The movie poster prominently displays
star Natasha Henstridge in a silly uniform in front of a sillier backdrop
of stars with the slogan "Mating Season Begins" underneath.  People who
spent more than a dollar for this film should have known what they were in
for and expected the worse.  This Friday showing I saw with my brother had
a small audience who seemed to genuinely appreciate, and laugh at, the
cheese projected on the screen.  
I did not write this review, by the way, as a critic who expects an
Academy-Award-winning tour de force from a film like this.  Instead, the
four stars I award this turkey are deserved on the merits of having a fun
time with a bad sci-fi / horror film.  (I did deduct a star for an
inexcusable scene I'll discuss later.)  SPECIES II, like its predecessor,
reminds me of the 1940s-1950s Universal and AIP monster movies that were a
staple of my Saturday afternoons growing up.  Very few films these days
capture the magic of that by-gone era of Bug-Eyed Monsters, army generals,
and scientists' daughters like the two SPECIES films do.  
Returning now to the Kent Cinema last Wednesday, which would have been
April 29, 1998 (obviously, it didn't take long for SPECIES II to leave
first-run theaters), I convinced a couple friends to go see it with me.
Knowing them fairly well, I expected they would find the film a humorous
romp too.  The packed audience, however, surprised me with their continuous
berating of the movie.  I haven't been part of a movie crowd who had this
much fun at a bad movie in quite some time (although I did hear one guy
behind me ask his neighbor "is this supposed to be funny?" early on in the
film).  It was like a spontaneous, impromptu showing of THE ROCKY HORROR
PICTURE SHOW without fans dressed up in costume.  They laughed with good
reason too.  The opening scene involves a slow-moving space shuttle with
corporate logos painted on the end of it like tacky bumper stickers,
bringing allusions to Mel Brooks's SPACEBALLS' opening sequence from the
crowd.  People got a real hoot out of the "Space Flakes" cereal boxes
predominant in a supermarket scene, and an over-the-top colonel with one
eye drew pirate-like "Arrrrr"s in every scene he appeared in.  
The convoluted storyline, briefly outlined in my synopsis above, is
laughable from start to finish.  Filled with technobabble and
inconsistencies, SPECIES II almost seems to challenge its viewers to
identify all of its errors.  Eve (who, in the first place, thought it'd be
a great idea to clone Sil from the first SPECIES, after all the death and
destruction she caused?) remains in a chamber isolated from men (in order
to keep her docile) -- even though she's allowed to watch baseball and "The
Dukes of Hazzard," and men constantly walk around outside the chamber.  Eve
has a device implanted in her head that's supposed to kill her if she
leaves her cell -- when she does escape, she has no problem, apparently,
with this device.  The list could go on and on.  
If the plot is considered bad, then the dialogue's worse.  A discussion of
SPECIES II's dialogue, though, could not be complete without combining it
with a discussion of its actors.  Natasha Henstridge, as in the first
SPECIES, does not have many lines here.  An attractive supermodel, she's
basically around to strut around in various states of undress.  Also
returning for a second go-round are Michael Madsen and Marg Helgenberger.
Madsen, as government agent Press Lennox, really makes these SPECIES movies
work.  He constantly looks dissipated and elicits laughter from the
audience in nearly every scene he's in (he's really that bad in this role).
 Madsen is quickly becoming the John Agar of the 1990s.  His best line, the
one which people laughed at the hardest during both showings I attended,
was a poorly-delivered warning about the alien menace: "they'll f--k
humanity out of existence!"  Poor Marg Helgenberger, returning as scientist
Laura Baker (Lennox's unlikely love interest) does not fare much better.
When Eve becomes a disgusting, nine-foot, alien creature (designed by
ALIEN's H.R. Giger) in a ridiculously over-the-top, slimy, gooey, bloody
scene, Helgenberger states "don't forget she's still half-human."  
The original SPECIES had first-rate, top-notch actors (most notably Ben
Kingsley and Forest Whitaker) embarrass themselves completely with their
appearances in the film, providing some of its amusement.  SPECIES II
continues this trend.  FORREST GUMP's Mykelti Williamson plays an astronaut
helping super-dud-agent Lennox and super-stupid-scientist Baker track down
the two aliens before they f--k us out of existence.  At one point, he
brandishes a sword instead of a much more sensible weapon, like a machine
gun, and claims "I'm goin' back to Africa on his ass!"  BABE and STAR TREK:
FIRST CONTACT's James Cromwell must also be regretting his choice of roles,
as he portrays a dumb-hick of a senator who is father to the astronaut
infected with the libidinous alien DNA.  
Justin Lazard has the role of the ill-fated astronaut who causes all the
chaos this time around.  He does a suitable job playing his character;
however, the character itself is the biggest flaw of the film.  In the
first SPECIES, Natasha Henstridge's Sil seduced men before she killed them.
 "Seduced" is the operating word here.  Much like the vampire myth, people
(men in this case) became victims because they gave in to their passion
under the spell of a seducer, whether that seducer was a vampire or, in
SPECIES, an alien / human hybrid.  (Sil, granted, also killed when she felt
threatened -- the train attendant being a prime example.)  In SPECIES II,
the same is true for the most part.  Lazard's character, Patrick Ross,
seduces the women around him, or he hires out prostitutes.  In either case,
these victims pay for their sins (or so it could be read as such).  In one
scene, a rather prolonged scene, however, Ross abducts a woman from a
supermarket and shoves her into a van to force himself upon her.  This
violation, even though the deed is interrupted before completion, is
inexcusable for a film that is quite obviously trying for a comic effect,
and it disrupts the otherwise cheesy, darkly humorous tone of the movie.  
Some critics took offense at what they deemed excessive gore in SPECIES II.
 In an obvious parody of the ALIEN series, for example, 8-year-old children
burst out of the stomachs of women Ross had sex with mere moments before.
In another scene, Ross tries to commit suicide by shooting himself in the
head.  Having blown it away with a shotgun, his head slowly rebuilds itself
as the camera pans around his body.  I'm not a big fan of gore in films;
the sight of blood makes me uneasy.  These scenes, however, graphic as they
may sound, are so unrealistic, fake, and over-the-top that they seem
absurdly funny rather than morbidly terrifying.  Scenes like these brought
laughter from both audiences I was a part of.  
SPECIES II is most certainly not for everyone.  It deserves its R-rating
and is completely inappropriate for children.  For those adults, however,
who still get a big kick out of watching and ridiculing bad monster flicks,
this turkey's definately up your alley.  (And, hey, what other film would
cast comic Richard Belzer as President of the U.S. while throwing Peter
Boyle in an insane asylum?)

Title
Review for World Is Not Enough, The (1999)
All of my film reviews are archived at 
http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Justin+Felix
This review has been submitted to The Shrubbery  
http://www.theshrubbery.com
Any comments about this review?  E-mail me at justinfelix@yahoo.com
Screenplay by Bruce Feirstein, Michael France, Neal Purvis, Dana 
Stevens, and Robert Wade. 
Starring Pierce Brosnan, Sophie Marceau, and Denise Richards. 
Rated PG-13 (contains lots of Bond violence, Bond sex, and Bond 
innuendo)  128 mins.
Synopsis:  British secret agent James Bond sleeps with three women (a 
doctor, a nuclear physicist, and a wealthy oil inheritor, no less!), 
drives a nifty car, and saves the world from a guy who has a bullet in 
his head. 
Comments:  This is Bond Film #19.  Nineteen James Bond movies.  It's 
incredible when you think about it.  After the sequel number goes up too 
high, usually filmmakers drop the numbers from their titles because they 
know that audiences get a little suspicious about the quality of 
sequels.  ALIEN 4, hence, becomes ALIEN RESURRECTION, and HELLRAISER 4 
changes into HELLRAISER: BLOODLINE.  The people behind the Bond films, 
however, are even smarter.  The movie titles make no mention of their 
main character, and none of them suggest that they are a sequel.  THE 
WORLD IS NOT ENOUGH, for example, bears no relation to the previous Bond 
film, TOMORROW NEVER DIES.  To further the cleverness, both titles are 
really cool.  I remember seeing a poster for THE WORLD IS NOT ENOUGH 
during the summer and immediately being drawn into the film's hype.  Has 
there been a cooler film title in recent memory than THE WORLD IS NOT 
ENOUGH?
THE WORLD IS NOT ENOUGH is not only the nineteenth Bond outing, but it 
is also the third movie featuring Pierce Brosnan as 007.  I'm not going 
into an elaborate discussion of which Bond actor has been the best; most 
argue correctly that it will always be Sean Connery.  Brosnan, however, 
has done a pretty good job at establishing himself as a respectable 
second.  THE WORLD IS NOT ENOUGH is certainly not the best Bond film 
ever made (indeed Brosnan's last outing in TOMORROW NEVER DIES is 
slightly better), but it is a respectable, watchable action flick good 
for a Saturday afternoon matinee. 
THE WORLD IS NOT ENOUGH doesn't deviate much from the traditional Bond 
formula.  Many of the same supporting characters appear here: Miss 
Moneypenny, M, and Q.  Bond scores with several good-looking 
models-turned-actresses.  He drives around in a souped-up sports car.  
The world is in danger, and he saves the day.  Sometimes the routine is 
good to see.  Unfortunately, another part of the formula exists in this 
film: bad guys don't kill the good guys--they just talk and talk until 
the good guys find an avenue to break free and save the day.  I don't 
know how many times someone had a chance to ice either Bond, M, or the 
nuclear physicist (more about this ridiculous character in a bit) but 
managed to screw it up because either (a) they wanted to talk, (b) they 
wanted to gloat, or (c) they wanted to restrain their captor for some 
other bad guy to talk or gloat to.  Sometimes you just want to tell the 
bad guys to shoot.  They'd win that way. 
There are actually a couple bad guys this time around.  I won't spoil 
the fun by revealing who the secret bad guy is; although, if you have 
half a brain, you'll figure it out pretty quickly.  The "bad guy from 
the beginning," Renard, is fairly original though.  Apparently, he has a 
bullet lodged in his brain that's slowly killing him.  That makes him, 
in some respects, more dangerous than other Bond villains because, let's 
face it, he doesn't have much to lose.  Also, apparently, this bullet 
makes him numb to outside stimuli, so he doesn't feel pain.  This makes 
him a bad ass when it comes to fighting.  It may not be realistic, but 
it's still cool. 
The most absurd aspect of THE WORLD IS NOT ENOUGH is not its convoluted 
storyline or electronic gadgets.  Denise Richards, pouty supermodel babe 
from such campy movies as STARSHIP TROOPERS and WILD THINGS, laughably 
tries to pass herself off as a nuclear physicist.  Folks, this is the 
most ridiculous casting I've seen in a long while.  My friend and I 
laughed a number of times as she spouted dialogue unconvincingly.  She 
was included, I'm sure, just so we could see her do a number of wet 
T-shirt scenes in the ultimate showdown with Renard inside a flooding 
submarine.  Oh, by the way, this "scientific thinker's" name is Dr. 
Christmas Jones.  I don't know which is worse: her name or the final 
Bond line in the film as he scores with Dr. Jones.  I'll give you a 
hint; it has to do with the old adage that Christmas comes but once a 
year.  Ugh. 
While THE WORLD IS NOT ENOUGH may not be a groundbreaking or original 
entry in the action film genre, it is still 007 and still entertaining.  
The film's opening, featuring the title song performed by the rock group 
Garbage, is quite good.  The closing credits promise that Bond will 
return in another film.  At least, unlike other film series that have 
gone on well too long like BATMAN and HELLRAISER, this is something to 
look forward to rather than cringe at. 

Title
Review for Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom Menace (1999)
THE PHANTOM MENACE (1999)  
(a.k.a. STAR WARS: EPISODE ONE)
A film review by Justin Felix.  
Copyright 1999 Justin Felix.  
All of my film reviews are archived at
http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Justin+Felix  
This review also appears in the Shrubbery --
http://www.theshrubbery.prohosting.com/0699/movie2.html  
Any comments about this review?  E-mail me at justinfelix@yahoo.com 
Written and directed by George Lucas.  
Starring Liam Neeson, Ewan McGregor, Natalie Portman.  
Rated PG (contains violence)  131 mins.  
Synopsis:  Jedi Knight Qui-Gon Jinn and his apprentice, Obi-Wan Kenobi,
protect the cute Queen Amidala and the computer-generated Jar Jar Binks from
bad Federation trade aliens and the menacing Darth Maul.  In the meantime,
they meet a young Anakin Skywalker and have their faces plastered on
T-shirts, boxer shorts, computer games, coloring books, potato chip bags,
action figures, and Taco Bell cups.  
Comments:  It is finally here.  After months of near-continual hype and fan
speculation, the first STAR WARS movie in 16 years has been released.  The
product tie-ins can only be described as an onslaught.  Walking into any
Wal-Mart or K-Mart right now is like entering Mel Brooks' store in
SPACEBALLS (a parody of the original STAR WARS trilogy).  Lines began
forming nearly a month prior to THE PHANTOM MENACE's release, and its
first-day box office total is a record.  Amongst all the interviews,
trailers, and plastic Taco Bell cups, one may ask "Is this all worth it?"
Despite whatever negative thing you may have heard from movie critics privy
to advance screenings, the answer is "yes it is!"
Whether or not THE PHANTOM MENACE "beats" TITANIC as the biggest-grossing
film of all time seems largely irrelevant to me.  THE PHANTOM MENACE,
whatever it ultimately grosses, may be the biggest movie event of the decade
(it certainly is the most anticipated).  As such, it seems to be attracting
some controversy:  Is it as good as the ground-breaking STAR WARS, EMPIRE
STRIKES BACK, and RETURN OF THE JEDI?  Is it too childish?  Is it too hyped?
The answer to all three, as far as I'm concerned, is yes.  But who cares?
Going to the theater and watching THE PHANTOM MENACE was fun.  It was very
fun.  From start to finish.  I can't wait to see it again.  This is a movie
to see in the theaters again and again.  How many times does one honestly
feel that way about a film?  (Science fiction fans, by the way, are having a
good year.  THE MATRIX, released a month or two ago, was also very
entertaining, though, unlike THE PHANTOM MENACE, it isn't a movie for the
kids.)  Before rambling on and on about the movie, perhaps a brief overview
is in order.  
THE PHANTOM MENACE is a prequel to the earlier STAR WARS trilogy.  Yet,
anyone who has seen the last STAR WARS movie, RETURN OF THE JEDI, can most
certainly tell, right away, that technology has advanced considerably.  At
its heart, THE PHANTOM MENACE is a visual movie.  George Lucas has created a
jaw-dropping whopper of a visual feast for the eyes.  Using, once again,
ground-breaking technology, he has constructed convincing alien vistas.  One
planet, Coruscant, featured giant skyscrapers and countless ships which
continuously zigzagged across the horizon, while another planet, Naboo,
contained vast underwater cities.  Stunningly designed creatures inhabit
these places.  In a memorable scene early in the movie, the Jedi Knights and
Jar Jar are nearly consumed by a giant fish.  They are saved only when an
even larger fish preys on the smaller.
One common criticism of THE PHANTOM MENACE is that it lacks well-developed
characters.  While this complaint does hold some validity, it did not really
seem to hinder the movie's overall impact.  The human characters are
well-played by fine actors.  Qui-Gon Jinn is played by Liam Neeson, a
wonderful actor perhaps most notable for playing the lead in the powerful
World War II film SCHINDLER'S LIST.  Obi-Wan Kenobi is handled ably by Ewan
McGregor (yes, amazingly, the same Ewan McGregor who played Rent Boy in the
heroin flick TRAINSPOTTING).  The young and appealing Natalie Portman played
Queen Amidala.  She's appeared in a number of other films, including one of
my favorites, HEAT, one of the most overlooked and underappreciated action
films of the decade.  Throw in Samuel Jackson as a Jedi, and you've got some
serious talent at your disposal.  
Yet, if anything, the acting seems subdued and takes a second stage to the
visuals of the film.  The most memorable characters, in fact, are memorable
for their appearance.  Queen Amidala, for instance, changes outfits in
nearly every scene, several of which are strikingly offbeat, bizarre, and,
well, alien.  My favorite of the new characters, Darth Maul, has a look that
is well-conceived.  Bloodshot red eyes, scarlet and black tattoos(?), and
bony protubrences make him seem like the devil himself.  Darth Maul, unlike
his counterpart in the original trilogy, Darth Vader, has very few lines.
He rasps something about gaining revenge, at last, on the Jedi, but, for the
most part, he just looks evil and tries to kick the living crap out of the
Jedi.  As I watched the film, I wanted to know much more than was revealed
about this character, but, afterward, I changed my mind.  Somehow, in
retrospect, he seems more evil having not been developed.  Once again, the
most memorable scene involving this character was a visual not a verbal
scene.  In the climatic battle between the Jedi, Darth Maul is seperated
from his opponents by some sort of transparent blast shield.  Maul paces the
length of the shield back and forth, like a wild animal in a cage, glowering
at the men he is about to fight.  If you haven't seen the movie, trust me,
this is good stuff.  Maul seems to have the habit of just appearing at
certain times, immediately ready to kick ass.  
Jar Jar Binks, a computer-generated character, was perhaps my biggest
concern going into the film.  I'm not a big fan of the goofy, cutesy stuff
in the original trilogy.  The Ewoks, for instance, are too teddy bear-ish
for my taste.  Yet, to my surprise, the comic relief coming from Jar Jar was
usually quite effective.  The floppy-eared character stumbles from one scene
to another, and, though not always on target, its humorous exploits often
elicited a laugh from me.
A couple of minor things did bother me enough to downgrade this movie from a
five-star rating.  These things, by no mean, subtract from my recommendation
of this movie to anybody.  I was disappointed, however, that Lucas chose to
give some kind of biological, scientific explanation for the Force.
Qui-Gon, for instance, has Anakin's blood analyzed because it is unusually
concentrated with some gobbedlygook.  This seemed to take a lot of the
mysticism out of the Force.  Also, occasionally, Lucas gets a little too
carried away with "the messages" in his screenplay.  Some of Anakin's
dialogue suffers because of this.  
Overall, however, THE PHANTOM MENACE receives my high recommendation.  It is
a fun movie that can be enjoyed by all ages.  Don't over-analyze it like I
just did.  Just sit back in the theater seats and enjoy the sights and
sounds (John Williams, by the way, returns to add another magnificent score
to his body of work).  And, if you must, wear that Darth Maul T-shirt and
eat Pez from Star Wars dispensers while you're at it.  

Title
Review for Babysitter, The (1995)
Written and directed by Guy Ferland
Based on a short story by Robert Coover
Starring Alicia Silverstone, Jeremy London, J.T. Walsh
Rated R (contains violence, profanity, and brief nudity)  90 minutes
Synopsis:  A small town thug convinces a dimwitted high-school student to
spy on his girlfriend, who is babysitting three unruly kids for their
alcoholic parents on a Friday night.  While this is going on, the thug, the
father, the boyfriend, and a kid reaching the onset of puberty all have
fantasies about the babysitter.
Comments:  To say this movie is bad would be quite an understatement.  I'm
not sure what writer and director Ferland was hoping to accomplish with THE
BABYSITTER.  Suspense?  Family drama?  Humor?  Erotica?  Elements of each
of these genres exist in the film, yet it fails to successfully achieve any
of them.  Instead, THE BABYSITTER is a dull, lifeless movie which manages
to bore and ultimately irritate its viewers.
I suppose this film could have been watchable if it weren't for the fact
that the characters are universally unappealing.  Alicia Silverstone is
completely wasted playing Jennifer, the babysitter.  Her character has
absolutely no depth at all, and her sole purpose in the movie is to be the
object of the other characters' fantasies.  Everyone else in the film seems
to be in a competition to see who can stoop to the lowest level by the time
the film ends.  The parents are alcoholics who become increasingly
obnoxious as the movie proceeds.  The father (played by J.T. Walsh)
fantasizes about the babysitter; the mother fantasizes about her husband's
best friend.  None of these fantasy sequences, trust me, are things that
need to be seen, but we see them anyway, complete with cheesy, make-out
saxophone music.  The thug, in the meantime, proves that he's evil through
his annoying habit of smashing half-empty beer bottles all of a sudden and
for no apparent reason.  The most absurd character, however, is the
babysitter's boyfriend who seems catatonically brain-dead.  The thug, in a
manipulative, Iago-like manner (though he doesn't really need to try hard),
manages to talk the boyfriend into binge-drinking, smoking grass, running
away from cops, and playing Peeping Tom on his own girlfriend in a matter
of minutes.  Incredible!  (Of course, the boyfriend's original plan for the
evening was, try not to laugh, to sit in an empty diner and read CATCHER IN
THE RYE by J.D. Salinger.)
If the goal of THE BABYSITTER was to be suspenseful, then it fails.  There
are surprisingly few tense moments in this film, and nearly all of them
come at the final minute.  By that time, however, the audience is so tired
of the inane characters that no one truthfully cares what happens to any of
them.  No suspense occurs in the dream sequences either because every
single one of them is obviously a dream sequence from its inception.  If
the goal of THE BABYSITTER was to be humorous, then it also fails.  I found
nothing even remotely funny about the boozing parents who seemed, at times,
to be played for laughs.  If the goal of THE BABYSITTER was to be dramatic,
then, once again, it fails.  The characters are one-dimensional and
uninteresting.  Finally, if the goal of THE BABYSITTER was to be
titillating (the type of film destined to be played ad infinitum on HBO at
2 in the morning), then it fails as well.  The dream sequences aren't
erotic; they are too brief and, outside of one very short scene, contain no
nudity.
I can't completely trash this movie.  The first 10 minutes or so vaguely
resemble an interesting film, and the conclusion sports a halfway decent
fistfight.  The other 79 minutes, though, are a drag.  Silverstone's
character, at the end of the movie, turns to her boyfriend and asks "what
were you thinking?"  I asked myself the same question, having spent 99
cents renting this turkey.

Title
Review for Star Trek: Insurrection (1998)
STAR TREK: INSURRECTION (1998)
A film review by Justin Felix.  
Copyright 1998 Justin Felix.  
All of my film reviews are archived at
http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Justin+Felix  
This review also appears in the Shrubbery --
http://www.theshrubbery.prohosting.com/0199/movie3.html 
Written by Rick Berman and Michael Piller.  
Directed by Jonathan Frakes.  
Starring Patrick Stewart, Jonathan Frakes, Brent Spiner, F. Murray Abraham.  
Rated PG (contains violence and mild profanity) 102 mins.  
Synopsis:  Captain Picard and the crew of the starship Enterprise disobey
Federation orders and defend a peaceful community of 600, the Ba'ku, from
the evil Admiral Dougherty and Ru'afro.  The Enterprise crew, in the
meantime, experience the rejuvenating qualities of the Ba'ku homeworld: Lt.
Worf grows a pimple, Data sings opera pieces, Picard scores with a Ba'ku
chick, Riker shaves while sharing a bubblebath with Troi, and the Enterprise
women note their firmer breasts.
Comments:  "Star Trek: the Next Generation" was a hugely successful sequel
TV series to "Star Trek," a science fiction series which developed a devoted
fan following in the 1970s.  Even though it still enjoyed high ratings,
"Star Trek: the Next Generation" ended production after seven years so that
the cast could replace the original "Star Trek"'s cast in Paramount's film
franchise centering on the voyages of the starship Enterprise.  
STAR TREK: INSURRECTION is the ninth "Star Trek" movie and the third to
focus on the "Star Trek: The Next Generation" crew.  STAR TREK: INSURRECTION
qualifies as one of those movies Star Trek fans, such as myself, would rate
somewhere between "okay" and "good."  After STAR TREK V: THE FINAL FRONTIER,
a nearly awful movie almost as bad as the repugnant "Star Trek: Voyager" TV
series, "Star Trek" fans could probably swallow anything Paramount throws
out in the Trek film franchise.  I don't wish to spend this review comparing
INSURRECTION to the eight other Trek movies.  Most people reading this
probably haven't followed "Star Trek" anyway, so a comparison would seem
tedious at best.  Let me, thus, make my comparisons briefly so that it's out
of my system:  STAR TREK: INSURRECTION is not as good as the previous
installment, STAR TREK: FIRST CONTACT; STAR TREK: INSURRECTION's comic tone
may be best compared to STAR TREK IV: THE VOYAGE HOME; STAR TREK II: THE
WRATH OF KHAN is still the best Trek movie.
Okay.  Let's move to the movie itself.  STAR TREK: INSURRECTION infuses a
basic science fiction premise, humanity's exploration and colonization of
space, with a lot of lowbrow humor and witty oneliners.  This combination
works well more often than it fails, but when it does fail, the humor really
seems cheesy.  Much of this film appeals to Trek fans' nostalgic fondness
for the starship Enterprise's crew.  Audiences unfamiliar with Trek lore may
miss the significance of some plot points and may even become confused at
times.  
STAR TREK: INSURRECTION begins with scenes of the tranquil life on the Ba'ku
homeworld.  Forget the actors and special effects, the beautiful setting of
this movie, with its snowy mountaintops and verdant valleys, steals the
show.  This tranquility, however, is broken by Data, an android, who reveals
to the Ba'ku that they are being secretly monitored by the Federation and
their alien allies, the Son'a.  It seems that this world is a veritable
fountain of youth, sustaining its inhabitants indefinantly in a young,
healthy state.  The Enterprise crew, led by Captain Picard, investigates
Data's actions and uncovers a conspiracy between the Son'a and an Enterprise
admiral to relocate the Ba'ku and plunder the planet's youth-restoring
properties.  Sound pretty heavy?  It is, though this plot, anything but
unique and groundbreaking, is undermined by the film's constant barrage of
humor.  When going after Data, for instance, Picard sings an opera piece
with him (this is supposed to be cute and humorous).  In a much more funny
sequence, Work grows a large pimple on the side of his nose as a result of
his exposure to the Ba'ku homeworld, a pimple which his crewmates, try as
they might, cannot avoid looking at.
The acting in STAR TREK: INSURRECTION is, for the most part, pretty good.
Since they've been playing these characters for years, those portraying the
Enterprise crew reassume their roles effortlessly enough.  The terrific
actor Patrick Stewart plays Captain Jean-Luc Picard and delivers a moral
speech, Picard's trademark, with his usual aplomb.  Brent Spiner, another
fine actor, plays the android Data well enough again and provides the best
moments of comic relief in the film (though the old
android-wishing-to-be-human motif will tire some Trek fans familiar with the
routine from the TV series).  The supporting cast who appear in this movie
alone are also pretty good.  Despite many other critics' negative opinions,
F. Murray Abraham (the winner of an Academy Award for his performance in
AMADEUS) plays the major villain Ru'afro well enough.  Ru'afro reminds me,
somewhat, of the Baron Harkonnen in the 1984 film version of DUNE.  Like the
Baron, Ru'afro continuously has his skin looked after: it is stretched and
stapled by servants.  In one particularly memorable scene, Ru'afro becomes
very agitated, and his facial skin splits open and bleeds.  Ru'afro is no
Khan from STAR TREK II--the best Trek villain ever--but he is much better
than the forgettable Dr. Soran from STAR TREK: GENERATIONS.  (Okay, I
promise, no more comparisons.)  Donna Murphy must also be noted as a Ba'ku
woman, Anij, who Picard falls in love with.  Murphy is not a young woman
with a supermodel body; she is a mature woman with an attractive
countenance.  This is the type of woman whom Picard, for those who know the
character well, would be enchanted with.  In fact, the chemistry between
Murphy and Stewart works very well here.  A particular plot point involving
Anij's ability to slow time down, an ability which she shares with Picard,
becomes one of the most intriguing parts of the movie.
For as good as the actors and setting were, STAR TREK: INSURRECTION's
special effects were surprisingly disappointing.  They proved adequate,
sometimes barely, for a 1990s mainstream science fiction film, but they fell
way short of the standard Trek movie and paled in comparison to those seen
in the trailer for STAR WARS: THE PHANTOM MENACE (a trailer which reportedly
preceded many showings of INSURRECTION).  The space battles involving the
Enterprise and Sona ships, in particular, seemed trite and unsuspenseful,
and the final confrontation between Picard and Ru'afro took place on a
completely unconvincing interior of a satellite.  The new Enterprise itself,
only seen in this film and its predecessor, remains largely unexplored,
though its exterior doesn't look quite right for a reason I cannot explain.
Despite STAR TREK: INSURRECTION's frequent comic goofiness and occasional
substandard special effects, I enjoyed the film.  It maintains Roddenberry's
largely optimistic view of the future and rejects the gritty violence of its
predecessors, particularly STAR TREK: FIRST CONTACT (though, don't get me
wrong, the dark tones of Trek films like FIRST CONTACT can work very
successfully).  I'd recommend INSURRECTION as a matinee film for a Saturday
afternoon, especially for fans of Trek or science fiction in general.  Rated
PG, I can't see this film being objectionable to the viewing audience, young
or old.

Title
Review for Clan of the Cave Bear, The (1986)
THE CLAN OF THE CAVE BEAR (1986)
A "Turkey of the Week" film review by Justin Felix.  
Copyright 1998 Justin Felix.  
These reviews are archived at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Justin+Felix
Screenplay by John Sayles.  
Based on the novel by Jean M. Auel.  
Directed by Michael Chapman.  
Starring Daryl Hannah, Pamela Reed, James Remar.  
Rated R (contains nudity and violence)  98 mins.  
Synopsis:  Cro-Magnon Ayla loses her mother to an earthquake and escapes
certain death by a lion.  Reluctantly rescued by a Neanderthal clan who
likes to have sex doggy-style, Ayla grows up to become a blond, feminist
supermodel who challenges the Neanderthal patriarchy by throwing rocks and
giving birth without a mate.  
Comments:  Allow me to state for the record that I find Daryl Hannah an
appealing presence in movies.  She proved quite charming as the intelligent
astronomer in the romantic comedy ROXANNE and equally creepy as Pris in the
sci-fi classic BLADE RUNNER.  THE CLAN OF THE CAVE BEAR clearly tries to
capitalize on Hannah as a selling point: the poster art bears a striking
closeup of Hannah in tribal paint and the video box prominently features
her name in lettering the same size as the title.  Not even her starring
role in this turkey, unfortunately, can save it from being an unbelievable
exercise in cheese.  It's so uniquely bad (a film dealing with prehistoric
man that actually tries, and miserably fails, to be serious) that it's
oddly fascinating.  The ridiculous attempt at drama here leaves the
audience somehow transfixed, wanting to see how this dud plays out.  
THE CLAN OF THE CAVE BEAR is based upon a popular novel by Jean M. Auel.
To this day, the book possesses a loyal cult following.  I remember a dear
friend of mine had a dog-eared copy of the novel she had read as a child
with all the so-called dirty parts blacked out with marker by her
grandmother.  I have never read this book, but I sure hope it's 10,000
times better than its film adaptation.  If not, then I'm at a complete loss
to explain its popularity.  
THE CLAN OF THE CAVE BEAR immediately opens with a comically absurd scene.
A young Ayla, looking much like Drew Barrymore in E.T., tramps about in the
woods.  With her cute little ponytails and fur wrapped about her, the
audience's expectations of a convincing portrayal of prehistory are
immediately shattered.  What follows is a laughably choreographed sequence
in which an earthquake swallows up Ayla's mother (a blonde with fur
pants...er, leggings).  Tearful Ayla looks on as the cameraman shakes the
camera...well, as the earthquake slowly recedes.  A hungry lion becomes
interested in her for lunch, but the screaming six-year-old manages to
outrun the king of the wild and find a safe haven.  I won't detail the
story any further; this seems enough to illustrate my point.  This movie is
really stupid.  It never even gives the audience a chance to suspend their
disbelief.  Also, the obvious comparison between the appearance of
Cro-Magnon man in prehistory and the rise of feminism in our century is
about as subtle as burning a Wonderbra in front of Charlton Heston.  The
movie doesn't just suggest this message; it whacks the message into the
audience with a two-by-four.  A blond, gorgeous woman challenges the social
laws of a bunch of people in gaudy brown wigs.  She's of the "new people";
they're of the "old people" with "the memories."  Yep.  We get it.  We get
it.  
THE CLAN OF THE CAVE BEAR apparently received an Academy Award nomination
for best make-up, which surprises me.  The movie depends upon a lot of
make-up obviously, but much of it is unconvincing.  As stated before, Daryl
Hannah is Daryl Hannah here; she looks like she just stepped out of the
shower all the time.  The rest of the characters have dark make-up of some
sort smeared over them to look like dirt.  The face-painting that's
occasionally seen is perhaps the only notable work here in my mind.  
This movie also suffers from its new age trappings.  Maybe the music
sounded a lot more fresh or original during 1985, but now it sounds dated
and cliched, like poorly conceived elevator music.  Add to this the film's
faux-mysticism, including spirit animals and dream visions, and a narrator
who sounds like a psychic you'd expect to hear on a 1-900 number, and you
get a movie that has serious problems being serious.  
THE CLAN OF THE CAVE BEAR is rated R, though it's probably one of the most
inoffensive offensive films I've seen in quite a while.  It contains
several scenes of sex sans nudity.  The violence mostly consists of hunting
scenes.  The funniest moment of the movie occurs when a Neanderthal in love
with Ayla attempts to rescue her from a ferocious bear.  The bear bites his
head off and the audience sees it rolling about.  Although this may sound
gratuitous, I'm sure, it's so cheesy that it probably won't bother most
people.  
THE CLAN OF THE CAVE BEAR is a bad movie.  However, as I wrote at the
beginning of this review, it does have the distinction of originality.
Typically when I think of bottom-of-the-barrel films dealing with early
man, fantasy movies involving dinosaurs (who did not exist at the same time
as man) and Raquel Welch come to mind.  THE CLAN OF THE CAVE BEAR tries so
hard to be serious that, though it's so bad, the audience is still
interested by the unique setting and characters of the movie (which is why
I awarded this turkey two stars).  I have to think that fans of the book
would be disappointed with this film version; however, I'm only basing this
observation on the fact that the book is almost invariably better than the
movie.  I shudder to think that it could be otherwise...

Title
Review for Maximum Risk (1996)
Written by Larry Ferguson.  
Directed by Ringo Lam.  
Starring Jean-Claude Van Damme and Natasha Henstridge.  
Rated R (contains violence, nudity, and profanity)  101 mins.  
Synopsis:  Alain, a cop from "south of France," encounters the corpse of
his unknown twin brother, assumes his identity, travels to the USA, and
meets an annoying cabbie, the Russian mafia, crooked FBI agents, and his
brother's former lover, Alex.  After surviving car chases, street fights,
and near-deaths due to fires, Alain becomes nervous when he must introduce
Alex to his mother.
Comments:  MAXIMUM RISK's opening informs the audience that the scene takes
place "south of France."  The scene actually takes place in France, the
audience finds out, and I'd imagine the filmmakers probably meant "southern
France."  Why mention this?  Because I wanted to point out that one can't
apply logic to MAXIMUM RISK and expect it to work.  In fact, logic
immediately falls apart in this movie.  In order to enjoy it, ome must
throw logic out the window.  This movie, like so many other action movies,
is dumb.  Mindlessly dumb.  It competently delivers, however, a lot of
action in a slick manner; therefore, it manages to achieve what the
filmmakers set out to achieve.
In order to somehow justify one elaborate action sequence after another, an
action movie's plot must usually be contrived and contain many competing
factions.  Such is the case with MAXIMUM RISK, which is populated by
crooked FBI agents allied with the Russian mob, an alluring seductress, a
cop who has crossed the line, a cabbie who doesn't know better than to stay
away from dangerous people, and twins separated at birth, just to name a
few.  And, I haven't even mentioned the plot elements: fires, car chases,
chases through crowded streets with screaming pedestrians, lots of guns, a
chainsaw, and the obligatory sex scene (don't forget, Natasha Henstridge,
the femme fatale from SPECIES, stars in this film), amongst others.
Somehow, with a considerable suspension of disbelief, Larry Ferguson's
script manages to make most of these disparate elements work (occasionally,
something is so ridiculously implausible that you have to groan).
MAXIMUM RISK basically serves as a vehicle for martial arts star
Jean-Claude Van Damme, even though Natasha Henstridge prominently appears
on the poster and video box along with him.  Natasha Henstridge, a very
capable model-turned-actress, has surprisingly little to work with in this
movie.  She appears much later in the film than one would expect and
basically plays the damsel-in-distress who Van Damme must frequently save
from the bad guys.  Her role here comes as a surprise considering the other
movies she's been in to date.  (She played a tough cop in the awful
ADRENALIN: FEAR THE RUSH and a tougher, dangerous seductress in SPECIES.)
Those who are familiar with her "revealing" SPECIES character, though,
won't be surprised to find that she strips off clothing left and right in
MAXIMUM RISK as well.  She looks like nice in a beret too!  The main star,
however, is indeed Van Damme, and this movie features Van Damme fighting,
kicking, punching, and bleeding like he does in every other movie he's been
in.
The fights and the stuntwork are the true stars of the movie, of course,
and they're delivered frequently and entertainingly.  Occasionally, the
violence is slightly uncomfortable (in one scene, Alain slowly twists a bad
guy's hand which snaps when it breaks) and thus resembles Steven Seagal's
oftentimes disturbingly violent sequences.  For the most part, however, the
action is cartoonish enough to seem too unreal to be sensitive to.
Even if one were to excuse a number of faults due to its being an action
movie, MAXIMUM RISK still isn't perfect.  For one thing, at 101 minutes, it
plays too long for an action movie of this nature.  About 10 or so minutes
of scenes containing unnecessary plot details could have been shaved from
the running time.  Also, Larry Ferguson, for some reason, tried to inject
blatant humor, unsuccessfully, into the mix by introducing an annoying
cabbie with aspirations to be a novelist.  This character's lines aren't
cute or humorous (even Alain tells him to "shut up"), and the audience is
left feeling relieved rather than angry when he is killed by the bad guys.
Despite these criticisms, MAXIMUM RISK still delivers.  If you're in the
mood for a dumb action movie, you'd be better off risking this film than a
number of other turkeys out there in this genre.

Title
Review for Vampires (1998)
JOHN CARPENTER'S VAMPIRES (1998)
A film review by Justin Felix.  
Copyright 1998 Justin Felix.
All of my film reviews are archived at
http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Justin+Felix
This review also appears in the Shrubbery --
http://www.theshrubbery.prohosting.com/1298/movie3.html
Screenplay by Don Jakoby.
Based on the novel VAMPIRE$ by John Steakley.  
Directed by John Carpenter.  
Starring James Woods, Daniel Baldwin, Sheryl Lee, Thomas Ian Griffith,
Maximilian Schell.
Rated R (contains violence, nudity, and profanity)  107 mins.
Synopsis:  Swearing, cigar-smoking professional vampire slayer Jack Crow
leads his buddy Tony, a prostitute, and a Catholic priest into battle
against Valek, the world's first vampire, who is searching for the means to
be able to live in sunlight.
Comments:  As I write this, Halloween 1998 is a three-week old memory, and
Thanksgiving is quickly approaching.  Hollywood released a slew of horror
and horror-related movies right before and closely after Halloween, and
these movies are now slowly making their way through second-run, cheap
theaters.  The season brought us the campy BRIDE OF CHUCKY, the SCREAMish
URBAN LEGEND, and the more serious APT PUPIL, based on a short story by
Stephen King.  A latecomer, the sequel I STILL KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST
SUMMER, came out on November, Friday the 13th (aren't they just so clever
marketing a slasher movie on Friday the 13th?).  Having seen all these films
except the last (which has been slammed by most critics), I can safely say
that JOHN CARPENTER'S VAMPIRES, released the day before Halloween, was the
best horror film created for the holiday.  This does not necessarily mean it
was a great film--the aforementioned flicks were mediocre at best--but it is
entertaining, especially for horror, action, and "B-movie" fans.  
John Carpenter has done a number of film classics in his long and varied
career (however, he's also produced some turkeys).  His chief
accomplishment, so far at least, is the little 1978 film HALLOWEEN, a film
which became a huge hit and launched the teen slasher genre, including the
FRIDAY THE 13TH and NIGHTMARE ON ELM STREET cycles.  He's also done a number
of solid horror and sci-fi movies: THE FOG, THEY LIVE, STARMAN, and a remake
of the 50s classic THE THING.  Carpenter, unfortunately, seemed to be losing
his touch recently.  He directed Kurt Russell through the bad ESCAPE FROM LA
and Christopher Reeves through the even worse VILLAGE OF THE DAMNED (a lousy
remake).  Carpenter somewhat needed a film to resolidify his standing as a
premiere talent.  JOHN CARPENTER'S VAMPIRES, at least, is a step in the
right direction.  
Vampires, throughout film history, seem to be very popular with movie
audiences.  From Bela Lugosi's classic turn as DRACULA in the successful
Universal classic to Christopher Lee in England's Hammer cycle to recent big
budget epics like BRAM STOKER'S DRACULA and INTERVIEW WITH THE VAMPIRE,
these creatures of the night continue to rake in profits.  Subtle changes in
the vampire myths as they get translated through the decades may allow for
enough variety to keep people interested.  This year, for example, Wesley
Snipes played BLADE, a vampire slayer from Marvel Comics, combining the
vampire with the comic book hero.  JOHN CARPENTER'S VAMPIRES, similarly,
combines vampires with another genre, the Western (interestingly, the
Western had just been combined with another genre, science fiction, in
SOLDIER).  The results end up as an interesting mixed bag.
JOHN CARPENTER'S VAMPIRES begins promisingly.  Within a beautiful New Mexico
landscape, Jack Crow leads his motley crew of vampire killers into an
infested, dilapidated house far removed from civilization.  Apparently,
Crow's crew kills bloodsuckers in a unique manner: they pierce them with
cables attached to a running truck outside.  The vampires are thus yanked
from the darkness of their abode and into the sunlight, where they quickly
flare up into ashes.  The scene is effectively scary yet sets up the film's
darkly humorous tone as well.  After this beginning, however, the movie
slows to a crawl for about half an hour as the major conflict between Jack
Crow and the original vamp Valek is set up.  
Whether you like JOHN CARPENTER'S VAMPIRES or not will largely depend upon
whether or not you like the actors.  James Woods does a wickedly fun turn as
the lead vampire slayer.  He brings a manic energy which fits the character
perfectly.  Thomas Ian Griffith deserves an equal nod as the very effective
Valek.  He informs the vampire with a menacing quality equal to that of
other classic actors like Bela Lugosi.  If you do not like these actors,
especially Woods, however, you probably won't like this movie, as it serves
almost like a vehicle for the two.  As a side note, the highly respected
Maximilian Schell does a supporting role here -- this makes *two* so-so
Hollywood movies he's appeared in this year (the other being the somewhat
cheesy DEEP IMPACT).  
JOHN CARPENTER'S VAMPIRES is remarkedly different from the other horror
movies released this past month and a half in that not even a single
teenager graces the screen.  BRIDE OF CHUCKY, URBAN LEGEND, I STILL KNOW
WHAT YOU DID LAST SUMMER ... all of them center upon teenagers.  JOHN
CARPENTER'S VAMPIRES features an entirely adult cast.  This doesn't
necessarily mean the behavior of these characters, however, is any more
informed by intelligence.  People do stupid things in this movie just like
any other horror movie.  One of the reasons, though, that I only give this
film three stars is the attitude the main characters have.  Jack Crow and
Tony Montoya are uncomfortably misogynistic.  They kidnap a prostitute who
has been bitten by Valek and treat her like absolute crud.  Although she is
turning into a vampire, their treatment of her still seems cruel and
passionless.  The storyline's only major fault is to suggest that Montoya
falls in love with her.  Crow's treatment of members of the Catholic
priesthood will probably offend some too.  In one scene, for instance, Crow
kicks the crap out of a priest to get information, then asks the priest
whether he was turned on by the abuse or not.
Despite these faults, the final hour of JOHN CARPENTER'S VAMPIRES picks up
speed and is highly entertaining.  Not much more may be said without giving
away some of the plot's resolution; however, the final showdown between
Crow's "gang" and Valek's "posse" in a deserted town combines the genres of
the Western and horror quite well.  Ultimately, sitting through the first
half-hour is rewarded by the finale.
JOHN CARPENTER'S VAMPIRES is deservedly rated R.  It contains many scenes of
graphic violence, some nudity, and several words and phrases which will
never make it to commercial network TV.  This one's worth catching before it
comes out on video.  You could probably still see it at a second-run,
bargain theater for the next several weeks.

Title
Review for Malicious (1995)
Written by George Saunders.
Directed by Ian Corson.
Starring Molly Ringwald, John Vernon, Mimi Kuzyk.
Rated R (contains nudity, violence, and profanity)  92 mins.
Synopsis:  Melissa, a mentally-disturbed woman who likes to smoke, seduces
Doug, a minor-league baseball player who likes to study anatomy, work on
motorcycles, and make out with his girlfriend in a public library.  When
Doug decides to stop seeing her, Melissa maliciously takes revenge on those
around him, including his girlfriend, his mother, and his cat.
Comments:  MALICIOUS, I suppose, is an acceptable moview for what it is: a
cheap, B-movie thriller which rips off dozens and dozens of
spurned-psycho-lover-who-wants-revenge films (like FATAL ATTRACTION, HAND
THAT ROCKS THE CRADLE, etc. etc.) that have come before it.  MALICIOUS,
however, really doesn't provide very many particularly suspenseful moments.
 The plot starts off energetically enough, the main characters are
introduced and the affair between Doug and Melissa begins and ends pretty
early on in the film.  It starts to drag, unfortunately, after this.
Melissa will obviously try to take her revenge on Doug (as always seems to
happen in movies like these), but she does so in unimaginative ways that
have been done in other, better thrillers before.  She drugs someone.  She
kills a family pet and leaves it in the girlfriend's apartment.  And, of
course, she stalks, so we see a number of shots, which are supposed to be
suspenseful, where she's spying on Doug and his girlfriend.  I won't reveal
the ludicrous ending to this turkey, but I warn you that it's both
painfully obvious and a real yawner.
John Vernon does a remarkably good job at playing the not-so-bright
baseball jock who initially gets swept away by Melissa (one of the script's
faults is to try to pass off a character like this as a pre-med student).
The same cannot be said, though, for Molly Ringwald.  At times, she can
effectively pull off the obsessed lover routine, especially during her
silent, I'm-going-to-stare-you-down scenes.  At other times, however, she
just seems somehow goofy and out of place.  In one particular scene which I
guess was supposed to be suspenseful, she screeches "f--k you, you b-----d"
and throws a phone.  She delivers the line so ridiculously that one can't
help but laugh.
MALICIOUS certainly isn't the worst thriller of its kind out in the video
racks (a number of really fat turkies in this genre are out there), but it
isn't all that good or original either.  Feel free to treat this film
maliciously, watch something else.

Title
Review for Blade Squad (1998) (TV)
BLADE SQUAD (1998)
A "Turkey of the Week" film review by Justin Felix.  
Copyright 1998 Justin Felix.  
These reviews are archived at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Justin+Felix
Teleplay by W. Peter Iliff.  
Story by Bob Wolterstorff, Mike Scott, and W. Peter Iliff.  
Directed by Ralph Hemecker.  
Starring Corin Nemic, Yancey Arias, Joy Bisco, Lori Heuring, Mushond Lee.  
Dedicated to Brandon Tartikoff.  
Rated TV-PG (contains violence and mild profanity)  approx. 90 mins.  
Synopsis:  In "sooner than you think" America, the future of law
enforcement resides in Blade Squad, a ragtag group of culturally diverse
rollerblading cops with jetpacks strapped on their backs.  A dangerous
criminal, however, attempts to destroy Blade Squad after his brother dies
while being chased by them.  
Comments:  So, what do an ex-gangbanger turned insubordinate traffic cop, a
former prostitute with a substance abuse problem, and a junkie turned
Dennis Rodman wannabe turned cop who crashed four police cruisers all have
in common?  Why, they're all members of BLADE SQUAD, an elite new
crimefighting unit wearing black uniforms, rollerblades, and jetpacks!
They also carry video cameras so they can communicate with one another a la
the marines in James Cameron's ALIENS.  Yes, it's BLADE SQUAD, the Fox
Network's Wednesday Night Movie of the Week.  This "movie," marking its
dubious world premiere today, curiously has a number of guest stars.  "How
can a movie have guest stars?" you may ask.  Well, BLADE SQUAD is not
really a movie so to speak but a 2 hour pilot for a possible TV series
packaged as a movie.  BLADE SQUAD is dumb.  BLADE SQUAD is loud.  BLADE
SQUAD is obnoxious.  BLADE SQUAD will probably be a ratings hit and spawn a
long-lived TV series.  Why not?  After all, television has given its
audience crimefighters with talking cars ("Knight Rider"), fast helicopters
("Airwolf"), and super fast motorcycles ("Street Hawk"), and viewers have
eaten it up in the past.  So, why not crimefighters with jet-powered roller
blades?
To be honest, as a made-for-TV presentation, BLADE SQUAD is at least
watchable.  The film has a relatively large cast of characters, a
surprisingly intelligible albeit predictable script, and enough action
sequences to keep one half-interested.  I'd imagine adolescent males,
probably the target audience of this turkey, would get a kick out of it.  I
tried to keep that in mind when I watched BLADE SQUAD.  I can remember
liking "Airwolf" and "Street Hawk" when I was 10 or 11.  And, although this
isn't saying much, BLADE SQUAD is leaps and bounds better than the last Fox
network movie I had the displeasure of wasting time on: the insipidly awful
GENERATION X (a huge disappointment considering the comic book's terrific
two-year beginning).  But, I digress.  
Despite its limited appeal, BLADE SQUAD has a lot of kinks to work out if
the movie is to become a TV series.  One, it suffers from MTV syndrome: a
lot of quick shots and weird angles continuously jar the viewer's senses
while a near nonstop generic rock soundtrack blares incessantly in the
background.  Oh yeah, Dylan's "Knockin' on Heaven's Door" and Bowie's "I'm
Afraid of Americans" are used here, in rather poor taste.  Two, BLADE SQUAD
needs a new crew for the sound.  The substandard sound editing irritated me
to no end.  Characters' dialogue, at times, sounded choppy and
unintelligible.  During one important scene, a song played loudly in the
background.  When a character spoke, the song's volume dropped but did not
disappear.  As soon as that character finished speaking, the song's volume
immediately returned to its original level until the next character spoke.
This sounds trivial, I'm sure, but it distracted me immensely.  Finally,
this is commercial television.  Foul language is not allowed, typically, on
commercial television.  Thus, don't use foul language in a made-for-TV
production because that foul language has to be censored in some manner.
In an early scene of the film, for example, the lead good guy and bad guy
have a minor confrontation in the streets.  When the good guy spouts out a
bad word, a driver conveniently honks his car's horn off-screen to muffle
the word out.  In a "Seinfeld" episode, this technique proved funny; here,
it seemed goofy and cut the dramatic tension considerably.  Perhaps future
writers, if a show is spun out of the movie, could take a cue from Marvel
Comics' 2099 series of comics.  Make up a bunch of new bad words for the
future.  This way, you don't need a bunch of honking horns or other silly
devices to cover up foul language.  
Compared to the usual crap broadcast TV networks have to offer in terms of
movies, BLADE SQUAD is a suitable exercise in camp.  When compared to, say,
a movie studio film, BLADE SQUAD has a lot in common with a term which
shares its initials: BS.  (Review written August 12, 1998)

Title
Review for Deep Impact (1998)
Written by Michael Tolkin and Bruce Joel Rubin.  
Directed by Mimi Leder.  
Starring Robert Duvall, Tea Leoni, Elijah Wood, Vanessa Redgrave,
Maximilian Schell, Morgan Freeman.  
Rated PG-13 (contains violence and profanity)  approx. 110 mins.  
Synopsis:  An annoying, alcoholic reporter for MSNBC stumbles upon the
biggest story of the century: a giant comet is on a collision-course for
Earth.  A crew of astronauts attempt to blow up the comet with nuclear
devices but only manage to split the comet in two.  A salvo of nuclear
weapons, a massive underground shelter, and the astronauts' desperate
second plan become man's only hope for survival.  
Comments:  Judging from DEEP IMPACT's previews, I expected the worse.  With
syrupy phrases bandied about like "oceans rise," "cities fall," and "hope
survives," along with a melodramatic score in the background and a rather
cheesy image of a tidal wave knocking buildings over in New York City, the
movie did not seem promising.  Add to this the fact that another
high-profile summer flick, ARMAGEDDON, deals with basically the same topic
-- Hollywood has a hard time coming up with respectable disaster movies in
pairs (as the recent volcano and earthquake debacles illustrate).  I was,
however, somewhat surprised by DEEP IMPACT's strengths.  Instead of a
turkey, it's a better-than-average TV mini-series with a bloated 75 million
dollar budget and a shorter running time.  
Those 75 million bucks seemed well-spent, surprisingly.  The special
effects in DEEP IMPACT are very noteworthy (quite a feat considering the
countless movies Hollywood releases now which are predominantly
effects-driven).  Nothing shown in this movie, to further the surprise, is
particularly new or innovative.  People flee in vain through a crowded New
York City street, for example, with a giant tidal wave smashing buildings
and consuming cars behind them, a scene almost stolen from INDEPENDENCE DAY
(same city, similar street -- only, in ID4, it was fire rather than water).
 Similar destruction, both in cities and in the countryside, have been seen
in many other recent natural disaster flicks.  VOLCANO, DAYLIGHT, and
DANTE'S PEAK come to mind.  This doesn't, however, lessen the impact that
such images of destruction has on the audience (no pun intended).  Though
highly unrealistic, the outer space sequences are also visually stunning,
perhaps the best in the film.  
Whatever was left over in the budget after the special effects was still
well-spent.  DEEP IMPACT sports a very solid, respectable cast.  Robert
Duvall and Morgan Freeman give the most notable performances.  Duvall,
fresh off of his Academy Award-nominated work on THE APOSTLE, pulls at the
heartstrings as an aging astronaut named Spurgeon Tanner.  Tanner, an
experienced navigator and recent widower, overcomes the age discrimination
of his much younger crew to become a leader and a hero convincingly.
Morgan Freeman's always powerful presence lends credence to his job playing
the President of the U.S.  Screen vets Maximilian Schell and Vanessa
Redgrave play the divorced parents of the reporter who breaks the story
very well.  The reporter, Jenny Lerner, played by Tea Leoni, is the only
casting misfire here.  Leoni is wooden and unconvincing throughout; she
lacks charm, and many of her scenes are hollow and unsatisfying.  As one of
the major characters in the movie, this is a striking fault.  
Another fault, admirable as it may be, is that DEEP IMPACT attempts too
much.  I made a comparison earlier between this film and a TV mini-series.
DEEP IMPACT needs four or six hours to satisfactorily tell its tale.  The
story takes place over the course of a couple of years and involves a great
many characters.  We see the President and the government, the news media,
the astronauts of the space shuttle "Messiah," and numerous everyday,
middle-class, mostly white Americans.  Many of these characters are complex
and fascinating, yet not enough time is spent on them.  In order to be more
in-depth in a 2 hour movie, perhaps the screenwriters could have
concentrated upon one group of characters.  My vote would have gone to the
"Messiah."  The astronauts are uniformly interesting; all have families on
Earth (so we still would have a tie to the Earth); and, their sacrifices
are some of the most memorable in the movie.  We don't see them in
training; they're just introduced suddenly, given a party, and launched
into space.  
Focusing upon the astronauts would have also saved the audience from
sentimentally absurd scenes involving the middle-class, suburban, American
characters.  As primarily a disaster film (one could legitimately argue
this is science fiction as well), DEEP IMPACT follows some of the cliches
which appear in other movies of this genre.  We have pregnant women,
parents who sacrifice themselves for their children, and despicable
characters who turn over new leaves in order to become heroes.  Thankfully,
a dog doesn't play a prominent role here (dogs-in-jeopardy, a tired element
seen in disaster epics like DAYLIGHT, etc.).  Young love, however, does
appear: the child who unknowingly discovers the comet falls in love, gets
married to save his sweetheart (he's picked to go into the underground
shelter; she is not), follows her as she decides to spend the apocalypse
with her parents, and then finds her, somehow, just in time to witness the
movie's climactic ending.  Please.  This was the most unlikely subplot of
the film, and I, for one, did not buy it.  Though, as my friend and I
vacated the theater, I overheard two teenage girls talk about how they
hadn't cried so much at a film in a long time.  I guess it worked for some
people.  
Removing the plot from the critical equation (let's face it, most
special-effects driven films ask you to swallow a lot that's unbelievable),
DEEP IMPACT is an entertaining, diverting, early film for the Summer of
1998.  This is a film to check out on the big screen.  Rated PG-13, this
film makes a pretty good matinee movie with little that would offend the
audience.  The rather convoluted storyline, though, may tax some children's
understanding and patience.  

Title
Review for Green Mile, The (1999)
All of my film reviews are archived at 
http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Justin+Felix
This review has been submitted to The Shrubbery  
http://www.theshrubbery.com
Any comments about this review?  E-mail me at justinfelix@yahoo.com
Based on the novel THE GREEN MILE by Stephen King. 
Starring Tom Hanks, Michael Duncan, and James Cromwell. 
Rated R (contains scenes of extreme violence and profanity)
Synopsis:  1930s Death Row warden Paul Edgecomb begins to suspect his 
newest prisoner, a huge bulking man convicted of killing two small 
girls, possesses supernatural powers and a philanthropic outlook on 
life. 
Comments:  Stephen King initially wrote THE GREEN MILE, the story from 
which the movie is based upon, in installments.  In other words, the 
story appeared in serial form and was later collected and republished as 
a novel.  While some considered this a ploy to garner even more money 
from King's legions of fans, others saw this as an attempt to recapture 
the feel of serials from the 19th Century.  Charles Dickens, for 
example, wrote many of his novels in a serial form.  Several 
contemporary critics are beginning to accept King as the "Dickens of our 
day".  King's voice, in other words, is the voice of the latter half of 
the American 20th Century, they say. 
Whether or not you feel King is a great writer, a good writer, or a 
god-awful writer is largely irrelevant when you see a movie based upon 
one of his books.  While a number of turkeys exist (the recent CARRIE 2 
for instance), there can be no denying that several of the finest films 
produced in the last decade and a half are based upon King's stories.  
THE SHINING, the understated STAND BY ME, and the Academy-Award-winning 
suspense classic MISERY are just a couple examples. 
The film which seems to garner the most fan praise, though, is THE 
SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION.  Because of this, die-hard Stephen King fans and 
movie buffs have been waiting for THE GREEN MILE, in some respects a 
sequel to SHAWSHANK, to be released.  THE GREEN MILE, like SHAWSHANK, 
revolves around a prison, is based on a King novel, and features the 
same director, Frank Darabont.
Was it well worth the wait?  Yes.  Is it perfect?  No.  In fact, THE 
SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION may stand as the superior of the two films, though 
I do not necessarily wish to detract from THE GREEN MILE's appeal. 
THE GREEN MILE deals with rather unpleasant issues.  The main character, 
portrayed by Tom Hanks, suffers from a urinary infection and is in 
constant pain during the first half of the film.  He is the warden at a 
prison for Death Row inmates, most of whom are not pleasant people.  His 
staff includes a sadist who wishes to hurt the inmates in any way he 
can.  The audience is presented with three electrocutions during the 
course of the movie (set, by the way, in the 1930s), and these 
electrocutions are presented in a methodically slow and deliberate 
manner. 
The dark subject matter is contrasted, however, with dim-witted John 
Coffey, who seems to offer hope to all around him in the prison.  Coffey 
has been sentenced to death for the murder of two girls, though the 
audience, from the very beginning, suspects correctly that he is 
innocent of the crimes.  Coffey seems responsible for several "miracles" 
which occur throughout the film, and his sacrifices are obvious 
allusions to Christ (note that they both share the initials J.C.). 
While this all may seem "heavy" and dark, there are quite a few moments 
of human compassion and humor in the movie as well.  A mouse, christened 
Mr. Jingles by an inmate, in particular, provides several comic moments. 
 These moments are necessary, for the movie runs well over three hours.  
Add in trailers and theater promotions, the audience sits for nearly 3 
1/2 hours.  This is perhaps THE GREEN MILE's weak spot.  While a lengthy 
running time is certainly justifiable in many films, I couldn't help but 
feel that THE GREEN MILE could easily have been cut by about 20 or so 
minutes.  Several scenes seem to take too much time to develop. 
The acting in THE GREEN MILE is superb, and I wouldn't be surprised if 
an Academy Award nomination or two are in the works for the cast.  Tom 
Hanks is good as the lead, but he's supported by quite an ensemble which 
includes veterans like Graham Greene, James Cromwell, and Michael Jeter. 
 Michael Duncan seems to steal the show, however, with his massive 
presence as John Coffey, a presence which seems to hang over all the 
scenes that he isn't in as well as the ones that he is in. 
THE GREEN MILE was released during the Christmas season.  While it 
doesn't seem like a Stephen King film would make a good family holiday 
movie (and, make no mistake, THE GREEN MILE is certainly an adult film), 
its theme of redemption and sacrifice, oddly, do seem to resonate with 
the holiday spirit.  After the atrocious THE RAGE: CARRIE 2, it's good 
to see that America's most popular storyteller is again being 
well-represented by the movie industry.

Title
Review for Possessed by the Night (1994)
POSSESSED BY THE NIGHT (1994)
A "Turkey of the Week" film review by Justin Felix  
Copyright 1998 Justin Felix  
Screenplay by Mark Thomas McGee.  
Original Story by Fred Olen Ray.  
Starring Shannon Tweed, Ted Prior, Sandahl Bergman.  
Rated R (contains nudity, profanity, and violence)  84 mins.  
Synopsis:  A novelist struggling with his latest work buys a weird brain
with a protruding eyeball encased in a jar.  The brain exerts its evil
influence upon the novelist and his secretary, while his wife disapproves.
Meanwhile, a loan shark in need of a shave tries to leave his profession.  
Comments:  Why is this movie called POSSESSED BY THE NIGHT?  It's hard to
speculate.  Most of this film takes place during the day, and the only
thing possessing anyone is an icky, pulsating, bubbling brain thingie in a
jar.  In case you haven't picked up on this yet, POSSESSED BY THE NIGHT is
a bottom-of-the-barrel "thriller" (I use the term "thriller" loosely here)
which is really cheap and bad.  The plot, which sounds like a cheesy pulp
science fiction story from the 1950s, actually serves one purpose: to
exploit nude women as often as possible.  
Writing a movie review for a film like this proves oddly challenging.
There's really not much to say.  The acting is lousy; although,
occasionally, the attempts at acting are so absurd that they garner a
chuckle or two from the audience.  Most humorous is Frank Sivero, who plays
Murray, the novelist's agent.  He is so horrible in this role that one
can't help but be amused.  The plot sucks.  Nearly half the film is devoted
to a loser loan shark who wants out of the profession, even though he has
only limited relevance to the movie as a whole.  The dialogue stinks.  A
loan shark, for instance, tells another how much he loves bimbos, which is
something the audience really doesn't need to know.  Everything about
POSSESSED BY THE NIGHT is second rate, even the film credits.  As the names
of the not-so-talented film crew scrolled by at the end, Joseph Scales came
up, credited as being "Assistsant to Foley Artist."  Someone could have
used an editor!  
To be honest, the film is basically an excuse to flash frontal nudity and
show some sex scenes.  Playboy Playmate Shannon Tweed, after all, is the
star here.  I suppose that if one wanted this sort of thing, he would like
this movie.  Why did I give this turkey two stars and not one?  As a bad
movie, it is unintentionally funny enough to keep someone passingly
interested in the film.  If you feel possessed to see POSSESSED BY THE
NIGHT, however, I'd recommend you exorcise this impulse and watch something
else.  

Title
Review for Halloween (1978)
HALLOWEEN (1978)
A "Turkey of the Week" film review by Justin Felix.  
Copyright 1998 Justin Felix.  
These reviews are archived at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Justin+Felix
Screenplay by John Carpenter and Debra Hill.  
Directed by John Carpenter.  
Starring Donald Pleasence, Jamie Lee Curtis.  
Rated R (contains violence, profanity, and brief nudity)  93 mins.  
Synopsis:  Silent Michael Myers escapes a mental institution 15 years after
murdering his sister, dons a William Shatner mask, stalks an intelligent
babysitter, and terrorizes his hometown on Halloween.  Brooding, impatient
Dr. Loomis, Michael's psychiatrist, pursues him, constantly reminding
people that Myers is evil.  
Comments:  A challenge was made to me: watch and write a film review for a
movie that's actually good.  I decided that this movie couldn't be
something too obvious, like an epic that won a billion Academy Awards, but
it still had to be a genre classic of some sort (since most of the turkeys
I review are horror, suspense, and sci-fi films).  What better film to fit
the bill than the original HALLOWEEN?  
It's hard to believe that HALLOWEEN, a modern horror classic, turns 20 this
year.  To commemorate (or perhaps "cash in" is a more accurate way of
putting things) HALLOWEEN's anniversary, a sixth sequel is due out later
this year.  Titled HALLOWEEN: H20, it will star Jamie Lee Curtis and
reportedly (and thankfully) ignore the last four sequels of this horror
franchise.  Video Treasures released a special anniversary edition of
HALLOWEEN last year featuring a widescreen presentation and the original
theatrical trailer.  Two more good reasons to revisit the original and
write a film review of it.  
Though not the first slasher film ever made, HALLOWEEN's success spawned,
to a certain extent, the slasher movie craze of the 1980s which included
such franchises as FRIDAY THE 13TH and NIGHTMARE ON ELM STREET.  Despite a
few obvious goofs with the setting (e.g. it's October 31 in Illinois yet
all the trees are green), HALLOWEEN passes the test of time remarkably
well.  I am not a big fan of the slasher genre itself; most are derivative
and highly predictable.  HALLOWEEN, however, manages to be very suspenseful
-- and it does so without a huge body count and overemphasis on gore like
so many other slasher movies.  
HALLOWEEN's story appears simple enough.  Michael Myers, at the age of six,
stabs his sister to death on Halloween.  15 years later, capitalizing on an
apparent lapse in security at a mental institution, Michael escapes and
returns to his hometown of Haddonfield, Illinois.  Why?  It's never made
quite clear (although sequels would offer a few lame motives).  This is one
of the original HALLOWEEN's strengths.  Though the audience sees many
lengthy scenes from the subjective eyes of Myers himself, it's never quite
clear what he's up to.  The lack of motive adds to the audience's
uncertainty of what will happen next, intensifying the suspense.  HALLOWEEN
is a rare example of a film that never really answers all the questions
that it sets up but still pleases the audience.  Sure, suggestions are made
about the masked Myers: Dr. Loomis, his psychiatrist, connects Myers to the
devil at one point; children think he's some kind of supernatural
boogeyman.  Whoever or whatever he really is, though, doesn't matter too
much.  He's evil, plain and simple, and he has returned to a sleepy little
town where houses are lined up, row after row (like graves at a cemetary as
the movie implies but never explicitly states), filled with people in
danger of being slaughtered.  The twist ending becomes believable because
of the enigmatic Myers, and the central theme during the closing shots
suggests that evil never dies.  It just hides in places where you least
expect, waiting and watching for the right time and place to strike.  It's
truly creepy (and hard to explain to those who haven't seen the film
without spoiling the ending).  
As stated before, HALLOWEEN lacks the excessive body count that many
slasher films rely upon.  Myers murders a total of four people -- one of
them in flashback -- a comparatively low figure.  The murder scenes prove
frightning rather than disgusting (many slasher films use gory special
effects and lots of blood).  Myers dispatches his victims rather violently,
granted, but director Carpenter chooses not to linger upon the gore.
Instead, he shows Myers curiously examining the victims after they have
died, suggesting the killer has a child-like wonder or fascination of what
he has just done.  It's later revealed -- somewhat anyway -- what's going
on in Myers's head as he examines the corpses.  Myers is such a successful
horror figure in this movie that his presence is felt even when he is not
seen.  Carpenter effectively places the masked, cloaked figure at the side
of a scene or in the background watching.  Watching and waiting.  So, even
when he's not present, the audience never knows when he will appear.  In a
climatic scene, a classic scene in horror film history I think, for
example, Myers's mask slowly becomes illuminated by moonlight (?) in the
utter darkness behind a frightened babysitter (Jamie Lee Curtis in a
career-starting role).  To experience the full effect of Carpenter's
masterful usage of Myers's presence and nonpresence, one must see the
widescreen version on video (or, if lucky, at a theater).  The pan-and-scan
versions for TV and most video releases ruin the effect.  
Despite its low budget, HALLOWEEN possesses a very strong cast.  Jamie Lee
Curtis began her successful acting career as the virtuous teenager who
becomes trapped inside a house with Myers.  She plays the part convincingly
and realistically.  She will return to her roots in the upcoming HALLOWEEN:
H20 (as an interesting side note: Janet Leigh, Curtis's mother, will make
an appearance in H20.  Leigh also starred in the grandaddy of all slasher
films, Hitchcock's PSYCHO).  British actor Donald Pleasence, who would
become a mainstay in the lackluster HALLOWEEN sequels, plays Michael's
psychiatrist very well.  Some of his gloom-and-doom lines are performed in
such a fashion that they'll bring a smile to horror enthusiasts everywhere.  
HALLOWEEN is undoubtedly one of the best independent, low-budget horror
films ever made.  It is also one of my favorites (though, to be honest, I
have so many favorites...).  The last half hour of this movie is just
non-stop suspense.  It had me frightened the first time I saw it years and
years ago, and it's still effective today.  John Carpenter not only
directed and co-wrote this classic thriller, but he also composed a highly
memorable and chilling soundtrack as well.  The theme, typically played on
piano, resurfaces again and again throughout the movie, heightening the
suspense better than just about any horror film score I can think of.  All
in all, HALLOWEEN is a cinematic gem that came from a budget and
circumstances which usually produce turkeys.  I highly recommend it.  
HALLOWEEN is rated R and is very intense despite its relative lack of gore
and blood.  Children may be easily frightened, and people who do not view
themes typical in slasher films favorably (i.e. serial killers,
women-in-danger, or sex) will probably be offended by this movie as well.
Fans of the SCREAM movies, by the way, will definately want to check
HALLOWEEN out, as they borrow heavily from it.
Huh.  Writing a film review without having to ridicule the movie was rather
fun.  I'll have to do this again sometime!  (Review written on June 30,
1998)

Title
Review for Naked Souls (1995)
NAKED SOULS (1995)
A film review by Justin Felix.  
Copyright 1999 Justin Felix.  
Any comments about this review?  Contact me at justinfelix@yahoo.com  
All of my film reviews are archived at
http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Justin+Felix 
Written by Frank Dietz.  
Directed by Lyndon Chubbuck.  
Starring Pamela Anderson, David Warner, and Dean Stockwell.  
Rated R (contains nudity, sexuality, profanity, and violence)  85 mins.  
Synopsis:  Big-breasted and dim-witted sculptress Britt gets really mad at
her grad student boyfriend because he spends too much time on his
thought-transference experiments instead of her art showings.  Elderly, evil
scientist Everett Longstreet switches minds with Britt's boy, in the
meantime, and goes completely mental.  
Comments:  NAKED SOULS opens with a naked woman, and the movie makes no
illusion that it's a sci-fi vehicle designed to show Pamela Anderson's, um,
talents.  If you are really interested in seeing Anderson's talents,
however, I suggest you skip over this dud and watch the infamous Pam and
Tommy Lee honeymoon sex tape, now available on home video.  At least with
that "movie," you don't have to go through the painful experience of
watching Pamela try to pronounce multiple syllable words like "eclectic."  
A premise does exist in the movie.  Basically, while Anderson wears skimpy
clothes which barely contain her talents, she practices her art --
brilliantly slapping plaster of Paris on naked women.  Her boyfriend,
meanwhile, spends 20 hours a day in a morgue trying to view the memories of
dead prison inmates because this will "make a difference to humanity."
Whatever.  The movie fails to explain how these two hooked up.  Be grateful.
After we meet the evil Everett Longstreet, lots of technobabble and mystical
mumbo-jumbo get tossed about, Pammy has sex replete with cheesy make-out
music, and minds get transferred.  Never fear, though, Pammy uses her sharp
mental abilities (ahem) to save her boyfriend in the end.  Unfortunately, no
one saves the movie.  Avoid this would-be sci-fi thriller, unless you're in
for a good laugh or two.  

Title
Review for Tracks of a Killer (1995)
Written by Michael Cooney
Directed by Harvey Frost
Starring Kelly LeBrock, Wolf Larson, James Brolin
Rated R (contains violence, profanity, and nudity)  100 minutes
Synopsis:  The president of a company wants to test his self-appointed
successor, who's psychotic, and thinks it's a great idea to spend a week
with him and their wives in an isolated cabin a hundred miles from
civilization with no dependable transportation or means of communication
after a heavy snowfall.
Comments:  TRACKS OF A KILLER had a couple of strikes against it before I
even began watching it.  Strike one was the fact that someone had scrawled
the word GARBAGE on the videotape's sticker in black marker (not typically
a good sign when you rent a film).  Strike two came while the previews
played.  Did you ever get a sinking premonition about a movie's quality (or
lack thereof) while watching the trailers that come before it?  Well, the
cheesy films being advertised before TRACKS OF A KILLER were films that no
one has ever heard of starring people no one knows, and they all looked bad
(definately not a good sign).  TRACKS OF A KILLER itself completed the
strikeout.  About the only positive thing this film had going for it was
the fact that it sports some nice scenery.
To be fair, the first half-hour or so promises at least a watchable
thriller.  Wolf Larson, who bears more than a passing resemblance to Hugh
Grant, adequately plays the underling obviously set up as the killer of the
film's title.  James Brolin and Kelly LeBrock seem equally adequate as the
loving couple Larson will later threaten.  Brolin's character, for some
inexplicable reason, thinks its a great idea to spend some time in a cabin,
practically isolated, with LeBrock and Larson, whom he's decided to test
for the week before giving him full control of his company.  By the time
the characters arrive at the cabin, this film begins to become tedious.
Apparently, Brolin's successor's test involves chopping wood for the
fireplace and skiing, which don't seem like attributes necessary to run a
business in the city.  But, then again, what do I know about business?  I
do think, though, that they should have invested in some better furniture
for the cabin; its beds and closets have a habit of just breaking at the
slightest touch.
Larson's character accidently kills his own wife rather than the couple he
wants to kill.  This leaves the movie with an hour to go and only three
characters, which really isn't enough to sustain it.  The film's writer
must have taken a cue from Stephen King, as scenes from TRACKS OF A KILLER
seem lifted out of MISERY and GERALD'S GAME.  Larson and LeBrock fight and
torture each other (the tables get turned a couple of times) while Brolin
tramps around in the snow looking for help.  Some old guy's around too,
just so the killer can add to his body count without killing the couple,
who everyone knows will be alive at the end of the film.  The old guy,
however, miraculously survives his first death and appears later to be
killed again by the killer in a scene so ludicrous it's worthy of a chuckle
or two.  Outside of that chuckle, unfortunately, TRACKS OF A KILLER will
just bore you as the obvious plot is drawn out ad infinitum and the actors,
for some reason, become increasing obnoxious.  If you're in a video store
and thinking about renting this turkey, don't.  Make tracks to a far
superior suspense film, like MISERY.

Title
Review for Mute Witness (1994)
MUTE WITNESS (1994)  
A film review by Justin Felix.  
Copyright 1999 Justin Felix.  
Any comments about this review?  Contact me at justinfelix@yahoo.com  
All of my film reviews are archived at
http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Justin+Felix 
Written and directed by Anthony Waller.  
Starring Marina Zudina.  
Special cameo by Alec Guinness.  
Rated R (contains brutal violence, nudity, and profanity)  90 mins.  
Synopsis:  An attractive mute makeup artist, working on an ultra-cheesy
slasher movie in Moscow, witnesses the production of a brutal snuff film and
is subsequently chased by really bad Russians.  Meanwhile, the artist's
sister and boyfriend clumsily try to save her.  
Comments:  MUTE WITNESS came as a surprise to me the first time I watched
it.  Drawn by the clever artwork on the video box, I rented the film
expecting a complete turkey.  MUTE WITNESS, however, was original, offbeat,
and well-made.  It's one of those cool little finds that no one seems to
know about.  I've subsequently found it at most video rental places I visit,
and it may be seen, on occasion, on the Independent Film Channel.  
The first hour of MUTE WITNESS is extremely tense, as Billy, the quite
believable mute heroine, sees members of the Russian mob brutally kill a
prostitute while filming an illegal snuff film.  The rest of the film takes
good advantage of Billy's vulnerable position as a mute foreigner in Moscow
being pursued by powerful criminal figures.  To throw a curveball into the
fray, Billy's sister Karen and her filmmaking beau become bizarre figures of
comic relief to offset several violent sequences in what are some genuinely
funny scenes.  
A disappointingly trite ending and occasional comic blunders are the only
two things which mar this otherwise suspenseful film.  Look for Alec
Guinness (Obi-Wan Kenobi from the first STAR WARS trilogy) in a small role
as the evil Reaper.  Definately check this movie out; although, as a word of
warning, it does contain several scenes of rather grisly violence which
certainly aren't for the squeamish.  

Title
Review for Species (1995)
Written by Dennis Feldman.
Directed by Roger Donaldson.
Starring Natasha Henstridge, Ben Kingsley, Michael Madsen.
Rated R (contains nudity, violence, and profanity)  108 mins.
Synopsis:  An alien/human hybrid escapes a top-secret government research
installation, transforms into a sexy blonde, travels to L.A., shops for a
wedding dress, and searches for the perfect man to copulate with.  In the
meantime, an anal-retentive scientist assembles a team, including a
dim-witted assassin with a cat and an empath with a penchant for the
obvious, to track her down.
Comments:  With the recent release of SPECIES in a deluxe widescreen
edition on video (labeled a "Contemporary Classic" by MGM) and SPECIES II
currently in production for this summer, now seemed like a good enough time
as any to write a retrospective on this movie.  If one were to critique
SPECIES as an everyday, run-of-the-mill theatrical release, he would have
to conclude that it was a genuine turkey.  On the other hand, if viewed in
the humorous "just-for-fun" way that it should be, SPECIES turns into one
of the best bad science-fiction movies of the decade.  Complete with a
ludicrous plot, laughable characters, ridiculous dialogue, and
not-so-special effects, this film proves entertaining from start to finish.
The cast of SPECIES makes a suitable topic to begin with.  Yes, the
scientist in charge of the project which creates the human/alien hybrid is
none other than the well-respected actor Ben Kingsley.  The man who won an
Academy Award for his portrayal of GHANDI, the man who played superbly in
Spielberg's epic SCHINDLER'S LIST, is reduced, by the end of this film, to
shouting obscenities in a sewer while armed with a flamethrower.  How the
mighty have fallen!  As humorously miscast as Kingsley is, more laughs are
provided by Michael Madsen and Forest Whitaker.  The former plays an
assassin who spouts inane one-liners and constantly looks like he's in need
of Pepto Bismol while the latter stars as a psychic (oh, excuse me, he's an
empath -- whatever) whose insights are highly obvious to anyone with a
brain cell.  SPECIES also marks the debut of Natasha Henstridge, a very
attractive young model-turned-actress.  Though she plays the creature
christened "Sil" (the title character of this movie), she's basically
reduced to stripping naked in every other scene she's in.  This is far from
being a bad thing, of course, but it still seems a rather over-the-top way
to enter the movie industry.  (Unfortunately, SPECIES, to date, is
Henstridge's best film; her other two -- the okay MAXIMUM RISK and the
awful ADRENALIN: FEAR THE RUSH -- are forgetable.  Note to film producers:
give this lady a real chance!)
The plot of SPECIES sounds, and is, bewilderingly dumb.  This alien/human
hybrid grows at an accelerated rate until she's at her beautiful
21-year-old stage, then her aging abruptly halts.  (I guess SPECIES
wouldn't be as cool if Henstridge's character aged to death halfway through
the movie.)  In order to enjoy it, one must leave his intelligence at the
door; the story is full of holes.  Dennis Feldman's script is also full of
some of the worst lines in recent movie history.  It's fun to listen to the
silly dialogue which goes on between the characters of this film.  Perhaps
the best example occurs near the beginning: the team inspects a train
compartment which Sil has recently vacated.  A dead woman lies in a pool of
blood.  Alien gore drips from the walls.  The compartment is in complete
disarray.  Whitaker's psychic (sorry, *empath*), while studying the mess,
receives one of his "insights" which leads him to brilliantly note that
"something bad happened here."
One would expect spectacular special effects from a big-budgeted sci-fi
film from a major movie studio like MGM.  Expectations, perhaps, should be
even higher for SPECIES as it features the talents of H.R. Giger (the
bizarre artist who created the creature in ALIEN, a true science-fiction
classic) and Richard Edlund (the winner of 4 Academy Awards for his work on
the STAR WARS trilogy and RAIDERS OF THE LOST ARK).  Despite these talents
behind the camera, however, SPECIES has an undeniably cheesy feel
throughout the film.  Yes, most of the special effects are, at least,
adequate for the film (though hardly "special").  The finale, on the other
hand, looks absurd.  An obviously computer-generated creature who seems to
have stepped out of a second-rate video game menaces the characters in a
setting that is completely unreal.  It's rather funny.
SPECIES receives four stars and not a perfect five due to the fact that it
loses some of its energy right before its laughable finale.  Unlike the
rest of the film, which is fun to watch, this segment resorts to cliches
that have been done time after time before.  The team hunting Sil tracks
her through a sewer system.  Armed with flamethrowers and flashlights, they
shuffle around in the gloom to find her.  Dark tunnels.  Dripping water.  A
creature ready to spring out of the darkness at any moment.  Been there,
done that.  The worst part about this segment is that it is the only
segment which tries to be serious.  Perhaps that is why it seems out of
place and makes the film drag for a while.
Irregardless of the last criticism, SPECIES is one of the best turkeys ever
made.  Considering the various talented people who embarass themselves
through their involvement in the film's production, considering the bad
dialogue, questionable acting, and ludicrous story, SPECIES is a definate
winner.  It's a near-perfect movie for those in the mood to see an "it's so
bad that it's good" type of film.

Title
Review for Toy Story 2 (1999)
All of my film reviews are archived at 
http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Justin+Felix
This review has been submitted to The Shrubbery  
http://www.theshrubbery.com
Any comments about this review?  E-mail me at justinfelix@yahoo.com
Story by John Lasseter, Peter Docter, Ash Brannon, and Andrew Stanton. 
Screenplay by Andrew Stanton, Rita Hsiao, Doug Chamberlain, and Chris 
Webb. 
Directed by Colin Brady, Ash Brannon, John Lasseter, and Lee Unkrich. 
Featuring the voice talents of Tom Hanks, Tim Allen, Don Rickles, Jim 
Varney, John Ratzenberger, Annie Potts, and Kelsey Grammer. 
Rated G (suitable for all audiences; a few surprising sexual jokes will 
fly over young children). 
Synopsis: Space toy Buzz Lightyear leads "the boys" -- Mr. Potato Head, 
Slinky Dog, Rex, and Hamm -- into the big city to save fellow toy Woody 
from a rare toy dealer.  During their adventure, Buzz Lightyear 
inadvertantly frees another Buzz Lightyear toy and his archnemesis 
Emperor Zurg, while the rest of the boys face temptation from Barbie 
dolls. 
Comments: I'm not sure what impressed me more when I saw TOY STORY 2 on 
Thanksgiving Day.  I saw it at the new "Cobblestone Square 20", a 20 
screen multiplex with "stadium seating".  It was not the first time I 
had seen a film in a setting like this, but it was still a very nice 
experience.  TOY STORY 2, easily the best animated feature for all 
audiences in recent memory, made for very entertaining holiday fare for 
young and old, but the movie was almost overshadowed by a lengthy 
trailer for another computer-animated flick called DINOSAURS slated for 
a May 2000 release.  The trailer featured stunning images of dinasaurs 
roaming a prehistoric landscape, and judging the packed theater's 
reactions to it, this film is going to have a lot of pre-release 
interest. 
The movie at hand, however, is TOY STORY 2, and it is very, very good.  
This is a sequel to the 1995 hit TOY STORY, and, unlike many sequels, 
this is an equal to (and in terms of animation, the superior of) the 
original.  Releasing this gem during the holiday season was a very good 
idea.  The entire family can enjoy this film.  The children at the 
theater seemed to get a kick out of watching toys come to life when no 
human is looking at them, and they laughed at their visual gags and 
slapstick antics.  Adults seemed to appreciate the humor that was 
addressed to them.  This included quips about car manuals and traffic 
cones, and a blatant sexual arousal joke at the end of the film.  
Science fiction fans, like myself, absolutely loved the opening 
sequence.  In it, Rex plays a Buz Lightyear video game, and the game 
parodies several old SF movies, including STAR TREK 2 and 2001. 
The animation, produced by Pixar Animation Studios and Disney, is 
absolutely top-notch.  It is very rich and catches the audience's eyes 
from start to finish.  A huge pool of comic talent provide the voices of 
the toys.  These include multiple Academy Award winner Tom Hanks, HOME 
IMPROVEMENT's Tim Allen, CHEERS' John Ratzenberger, FRASIER's Kelsey 
Grammer, SEINFELD's Estelle Harris, and Don Rickles.  The cast is solid 
and entertaining. 
Some films, like comedies, transfer to the small screen without any 
significant loss.  A movie like TOY STORY 2, however, should be seen on 
the big screen.  One gets a better sense of the superior animation of a 
film like this only if he sees it at a theater.  Definately check this 
one out! 

Title
Review for Tunnel Vision (1995)
Written and directed by Clive Fleury.  
Starring Patsy Kensit, Robert Reynolds, Rebecca Rigg.  
Rated R (contains violence, profanity, and nudity)  100 mins.  
Synopsis:  Constantly criticized by their superior, two out-of-control
cops, one of them a suspiciously jealous newlywed, chase after a serial
killer with an artistic side.  
Comments:  To be honest, I don't have much to say about TUNNEL VISION, a
largely forgettable thriller imported from the Land Down Under, Australia.
Like the seemingly endless stream of movies dealing with serial killers,
TUNNEL VISION possesses the standard requirements: a couple of grisly
murders (female, of course), some clues, some suspicious suspects, and the
ultimate revelation of the killer's identity before he's taken care of by
the main character.  Perhaps the only thing which separates this film out
from the others (and the only reason I'm giving this turkey two stars
instead of one) are its main characters.  One of the cops turns
self-destructive during the course of the movie.  He believes his wife is
having an affair, accidently shoots a criminal, gets into disagreements
with his superior, and ultimately runs from the law in a maverick attempt
to solve the case and iron out his personal life (someone is out to frame
him).  The cop's life proves more interesting and mysterious than the main
plot of the film.  
Patsy Kensit, Mel Gibson's love interest in LETHAL WEAPON 2, plays the
cop's partner.  As in LETHAL WEAPON 2, she proves she doesn't have much
acting ability and delivers a very wooden performance.  None of the other
actors are particularly good here either.
As I've stated before (and as you can tell by the length of this review),
not much can be said for this film.  It is a by-the-books, pedestrian
thriller offering little that's unique or memorable.  If you're in the mood
for a thriller of this nature, I'd recommend something else.  You have a
lot to choose from in this genre.

Title
Review for Virus (1999)
VIRUS (1999)  
A film review by Justin Felix.  
Copyright 1999 Justin Felix.  
This review also appears in the Shrubbery at
http://www.theshrubbery.prohosting.com/0299/movie2.html
All of my film reviews are archived at
http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Justin+Felix 
Written by Dennis Feldman and Jonathan Hensleigh.  
Based upon the comic book VIRUS by Chuck Pfarrer.  
Directed by John Bruno.  
Starring Jamie Lee Curtis, William Baldwin, and Donald Sutherland.  
Rated R (contains violence, profanity, and excessive gore)  approx. 90 mins.  
Synopsis:  An energy life force from outer space smashes through the Mir
space station and rockets down to a huge Soviet ship.  A week later, a
sinking salvage boat named the Sea Star trapped in the eye of a typhoon
encounters the Soviet ship.  The Sea Star's ragtag crew boards the Soviet
vessel and discovers the alien life force is creating biomechanical
lifeforms with spare parts from machines and people.
Comments:  So, what do you get when you mix ALIEN, THE ABYSS, LEVIATHAN,
DEEP RISING, SCREAMERS, TERMINATOR, and STAR TREK: FIRST CONTACT with just a
touch of HALLOWEEN in a blender (if mixing movies in a blender were, indeed,
possible)?  Well, you'd get VIRUS, Universal's much delayed new sci-fi
thriller.  This film, to the best of my recollection, was supposed to come
out in August, but someone in the studio was nervous about having two horror
films starring Jamie Lee Curtis come out at nearly the same time.
(Dimension's HALLOWEEN: H20 was released around that time.)  So, Universal
opted to bury the movie in mid-January among several high-quality Oscar
contenders and romances for upcoming Valentine's Day.  Smart.  Those of us
who want to see this movie, me for instance, have to battle knee-high snow
drifts and frozen car doors just to get to the local theater.  Winter season
in Ohio, like most of the Northeast, has been especially cruel this year.  
Nonetheless, I managed to get out to see VIRUS on opening night, and I'm
glad I did.  Though by far not an original movie, VIRUS contains enough cool
special effects for its audience to overlook its many inherent flaws.  One
of these flaws, as you may well deduce from my opening comment, is that
VIRUS "borrows" heavily from many other sci-films.  The basic plot comes
directly from ALIEN.  This plot has been used, to varying degrees of
effectiveness, in countless motion pictures.  Basically, the screenwriter
puts a group of people on a ship, or some other isolated area, and has them
hunted by some sort of alien or monster.  Usually, this creature kills all
but one or two of the crew, and this (these) survivor(s) kill(s) the
creature in the end.  The creature in VIRUS is an
alien-energy-life-form-thingie creating all sorts of different biomechanical
monsters to terrorize the crew of the doomed Sea Star.  You'll recognize
these creations right away if you're a sci-fi fan.  Tiny mechanical spiders
from RUNAWAY.  Human-sized Borg people from STAR TREK: FIRST CONTACT.  Etc.  
To be honest, this creative "borrowing" really didn't bother me all that
much.  They say it's hard to be original.  I don't know.  Technically,
though, the special effects in this film are surprisingly effective.  Some
may not like them because they are, at times, quite gruesome, but most will
probably get a kick out of them like my brother and I did.  Besides, certain
parts of this movie are so absurd that they lend enough disbelief to counter
any real disgust one may get from seeing dismembered body parts and the like.  
The actors in VIRUS do a lot to offset any genuine terror the movie may
engender.  Donald Sutherland, a longtime character actor who has appeared in
such classic sci-fi films as INVASION OF THE BODY SNATCHERS and PUPPET
MASTERS, is ridiculously over-the-top as the Sea Star's greedy captain.  One
set of lines he delivered halfway through the film had the entire theater
laughing; it was *that* cheesy.  William Baldwin plays the male lead.  Is it
just me, or does Billy Baldwin seem like an actor you just can't take
seriously?  He almost always looks goofily perplexed.  One of the minor
characters tried to play the best Queequeg he could (someone put tattoos
over his face to make him look even more like the harpooner from MOBY DICK).
Only Jamie Lee Curtis is really convincing here.  Curtis is an accomplished
actress capable of many genres.  She can do comedy, action, and drama
equally well.  But, first and foremost in my mind, Curtis is a horror
actress, the Scream Queen.  She had her start in such early slasher films as
TERROR TRAIN, PROM NIGHT, and the quintessential slice-and-dice classic
HALLOWEEN.  She was also quite memorable in John Carpenter's overlooked
atmospheric ghost story THE FOG.  It's good to see her back in her element
again.  In VIRUS, she first seems to assume a Ripley-like (the heroine of
the ALIEN saga) character, but, surprisingly, she doesn't stay "tough"
through the movie.  Instead, she becomes so terrified as to be nearly
paralyzed.  Nobody can pull this off better than Curtis.  She was perfect as
the threatened babysitter in the original HALLOWEEN, and she pulls off the
scared-out-of-her-wits female lead without the camp the other actors put
into their roles.  
Overall, VIRUS is an entertaining sci-fi thriller which makes for a pretty
good Saturday afternoon matinee feature.  Fans of the genre will pick up on
a number of the sources for the creatures and storyline, but they'll still
enjoy it.  What variation of the same theme will Hollywood churn out next?
Let's hope it's even better than this.  VIRUS, after all, is a huge step
above the insipid DEEP RISING, last winter's
horror-on-a-huge-ship-floating-in-the-middle-of-nowhere movie.
VIRUS is rated R for a lot of violence and gore sequences.  It gets pretty
intense at times, so I wouldn't recommend parents taking the youngsters to it.  

Title
Review for Entrapment (1999)
ENTRAPMENT (1999)  
A film review by Justin Felix.  
Copyright 1999 Justin Felix.  
All of my film reviews are archived at
http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Justin+Felix  
This review also appears in the Shrubbery --
http://www.theshrubbery.prohosting.com/0699/movie1.html  
Any comments about this review?  E-mail me at justinfelix@yahoo.com
Story by Ronald Bass and Michael Hertzberg.  
Screenplay by Ronald Bass and William Broyles Jr.  
Directed by Jon Amiel.  
Starring Sean Connery, Catherine Zeta-Jones, and Ving Rhames.  
Rated PG-13 (contains violence, sensuality, and profanity)  112 mins.  
Synopsis:  An aging master art thief, his supplier, and a young, buxom
security consultant are all not who they first appear to be (or are they?)
in this convoluted mess involving a risky heist during the millennium.  
Comments:  This movie was boring.  Plain and simple.  
ENTRAPMENT should not have been boring.  It stars Sean Connery, who can
still carry an action film despite his age, Catherine Zeta-Jones, a likeable
enough film presence, and Ving Rhames, ultra-cool star of PULP FICTION and
MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE.  It takes full advantage of the Y2K computer bug fears
(a current "hot topic" in the news) in its storyline, which is set at the
end of 1999.  It has some genuinely well-staged action sequences.  So, what
went wrong?  Plenty, unfortunately.  
The major problem with ENTRAPMENT is its script.  It has a been-there,
done-that feel to it.  Nothing seems particularly inventive or original, so
the whole movie lacks suspense and drags (it runs nearly two hours).  The
screenwriters, for example, periodically use a countdown to the millennium
as a means of transition between scenes (i.e. "4 days to the Millennium").
This device was used much more effectively in the overlooked sci-fi film
STRANGE DAYS.  The characters are not who they appear to be at the
beginning, which is neat at first but the device wears thin once the
umpteenth "surprise" revelation is made.  ENTRAPMENT, in other words, relies
too heavily on the audience not knowing what each character's true motive
is, resulting in a convoluted story which leaves many scratching their heads
in confusion.  
The star power here is quite strong, but the viewer can't help but feel the
actors are wasted in this production.  Sean Connery is given such
mind-numbing lines as "Never trust a naked woman."  Ving Rhames' character
seems like an afterthought; he's not developed at all.  The camera zooms in
frequently and leeringly at Catherine Zeta-Jones's tight wardrobe.  This, in
and of itself, is not bad, but, after a while, it has a juvenile feel to it.
At least the SPECIES movies hold no bones about the fact that they're
exploiting the female body.  ENTRAPMENT does the same under the thin
disguise of plot development (Sean Connery supposedly falls in love with the
girl while watching her, in tights, arc and pivot around laser beams).  
The tagline for this movie reads "The trap is set."  It sure is, on those
who spent money to see this movie.  ENTRAPMENT really isn't that bad; it is
watchable.  I would suggest, however, one waits until this is on cable or
television to see it.  
